


6 CONTENTS. 

CHAPTER X. 
The Treasure-Hill ..... 146 

CHAPTER XL 
The Sand -Storm ...... 160 

CHAPTER XII. 
Jim Standing Siege ..... 183 

CHAPTER Xni. 
Going for Tom's Pipe ...... 203 



ILLUSTRATIONS 



" We catched a lot of the nicest fish you ever see." . Frontispiece 

" We went out in the woods on the hill, and Tom told us what it 

was. It was a crusade." .... Facing page i8 
" He said he would sail his balloon around the world." . . 26 

" And here was night coming on ! " . . , . -34 

" You want to leave me. Don't try to deny it." ... 48 

" The professor said he would keep up this hundred-mile gait till 

to-morrow." . . . . . . .56 

"The thunder boomed, and the lightning glared, and the wind 

screamed in the rigging." .... 60 

"' Run! run fo' yo' life! ' " . . . . . ,68 

" And there was the lion, a-ripping around under me." , . 76 

" We swooped down, now, all of a sudden." . . .84 

" The last man to go snatched up a child, and carried it off in front 

of him on his horse." ...... 90 

" We come a-whizzing down, made a swoop, and knocked him out 

of the saddle, child and all." . . . . .94 

" And where 's your railroad, 'longside of a flea?" . . 98 

" Where 's your man now ? " ...... 106 

" That flea would be president of the United States, and you could 

not prevent it." ....... no 

" We opened the box, and it had gems and jewels in it." . . 118 

" And all this time the lions and tigers was sorting out the clothes." 130 
The camel-driver in the treasure-cave. .... 148 

In the sand-storm. ....... 162 

The wedding procession. ...... 168 

" When they danced we joined in and shook a foot up there." . 174 

Jim standing a siege. ....... 190 

Rescue of Jim. ....... 198 

Homeward Bound. . . , . . = • 208 

Map. ...«,,,.. 214 



 

CHAPTER I. 

TOM SEEKS NEW ADVENTURES. 

Do you reckon Tom Sawyer was satisfied after 
all them adventures ? I mean the adventures 
we had down the river, and the time we set the 
darky Jim free and Tom got shot in the leg. 
No, he was n't. It only just p'isoned him for 
more.^ That was all the effect it had. You see, 
when we three came back up the river in glory, 
as you may say, from that long travel, and the 
village received us with a torchlight procession 
and speeches, and everybody hurrah' d and shout- 
ed, it made us heroes, and that was what Tom 
Sawyer had always been hankering to be. 

For a while he zcas satisfied. Everybody made 
much of him, and he tilted up his nose and 
stepped around the town as though he owned it. 
Some called him Tom Sawyer the Traveler, and 
that just swelled him up fit to bust. You see he 
laid over me and Jim considerable, because we 
only went down the river on a raft and came 



lO  

back by the steamboat, but Tom went by the 
steamboat both ways. The boys envied me and 
Jim a good deal, but land! they just knuckled 
to the dirt before TOM. 

Well, I don't know ; maybe he might have 
been satisfied if it had n't been for old Nat Par- 
sons, which was postmaster, and powerful long 
and slim, and kind o' good-hearted and silly, and 
bald-headed, on account of his age, and about 
the talkiest old cretur I ever see. For as much 
as thirty years he 'd been the only man in the 
village that had a reputation — I mean a reputa- 
tion for being a traveler, and of course he was 
mortal proud of it, and it was reckoned that in 
the course of that thirty years he had told about 
that journey over a million times and enjoyed it 
every time. And now comes along a boy not 
quite fifteen, and sets everybody admiring and 
gawking over his travels, and it just give the poor 
old man the high strikes. It made him sick to 
listen to Tom, and to hear the people say " My 
land!" ''Did you ever!" ''My goodness sakes 
alive ! " and all such things ; but he could n't pull 
away from it, any more than a fly that 's got its 
hind leg fast in the molasses. And always when 
Tom come to a rest, the poor old cretur would 



TOM SEEKS NEW ADVENTURES. II 

chip in on his same old travels and work them 
for all they were worth, but they were pretty 
faded, and did n't go for much, and it was pitiful 
to see. And then Tom would take another in- 
nings, and then the old man again — and so on, 
and so on, for an hour and more, each trying to 
beat out the other. 

You see. Parsons' travels happened like this : 
When he first got to be postmaster and was green 
in the business, there come a letter for somebody 
he did n't know, and there was n't any such person 
in the village. Well, he did n't know what to do, nor 
how to act, and there the letter stayed and stayed, 
week in and week out, till the bare sight of it 
give him a conniption. The postage was n't paid 
on it, and that was another thing to worry about. 
There was n't any way to collect that ten cents, 
and he reckon'd the Gov'ment would hold him 
responsible for it and maybe turn him out be- 
sides, when they found he had n't collected it. 
W^ell, at last he could n't stand it any longer. He 
could n't sleep nights, he could n't eat. he was 
thinned down to a shadder, yet he da'sn't ask 
anybody's advice, for the very person he asked 
for advice might go back on him and let the 
Gov'ment know about the letter. He had the 



12  

letter buried under the floor, but that did no 
good ; if he happened to see a person standing 
over the place it 'd give him the cold shivers, and 
loaded him up with suspicions, and he would sit 
up that night till the town was as still and dark, 
and then he would sneak there and get it out and 
bury it in another place. Of course people got 
to avoiding him and shaking their heads and 
whispering, because, the way he was looking and 
acting, they judged he had killed somebody or 
done something terrible, they did n't know what, 
and if he had been a stranger they would 've 
lynched him. 

Well, as I was saying, it got so he could n't 
stand it any longer ; so he made up his mind to 
pull out for Washington, and just go to the Pres- 
ident of the United States and make a clean 
breast of the whole thing, not keeping back an 
atom, and then fetch the letter out and lay it be- 
fore the whole Gov'ment, and say, **Now, there 
she is — do with me what you 're a mind to; 
though as heaven is my judge I am an innocent 
man and not deserving cf the full penalties of the 
law and leaving behind me a family that must 
starve and yet had n't had a thing to do with it, 
which is the whole truth and I can swear to it." 



TOM SEEKS NEW ADVENTURES. 13 

So he did it. He had a httle wee bit of steam- 
boating, and some stage-coaching, but all the rest 
of the way was horseback, and it took him three 
weeks to get to Washington. He saw lots of land 
and lots of villages and four cities. He was gone 
'most eight weeks, and there never was such a 
proud man in the village as when he got back. 
His travels made him the greatest man in all that 
region, and the most talked about ; and people 
come from as much as thirty miles back in the 
country, and from over in the Illinois bottoms, 
too, just to look at him — and there they 'd stand 
and gawk, and he 'd gabble. You never see any- 
thing like it. 

Well, there was n't any way, now, to settle 
which was the greatest traveler ; some said it was 
Nat, some said it was Tom. Everybody allowed 
that Nat had seen the most longitude, but they 
had to give in that whatever Tom was short in 
longitude he had made up in latitude and climate. 
It was about a stand-off ; so both of them had to 
whoop up their dangerous adventures, and try to 
get ahead that way. That bullet-wound in Tom's 
leg was a tough thing for Nat Parsons to buck 
against, but he bucked the best he could ; and at 
a disadvantage, too, for Tom did n't set still as 



14  

he 'd orter done, to be fair, but always got up 
and sauntered around and worked his hmp while 
Nat was painting up the adventure that /le had 
in Washington ; for Tom never let go that limp 
when his leg got well, but practised it nights at 
home, and kept it good as new right along. 

Nat's adventure was like this ; I don't know 
how true it is; maybe he got it out of a paper, or 
somewhere, but I will say this for him, that he 
did know how to tell it. He could make any- 
body's flesh crawUand he 'd turn pale and hold 
his breath when he told it, and sometimes women 
and girls got so faint they could n't stick it out. 
Well, it was this way, as near as I can remem- 
ber : 

He come a-loping into Washington, and put up 
his horse and shoved out to the President's house 
with his letter, and they told him the President 
was up to the Capitol, and just going to start for 
Philadelphia — not a minute to lose if he wanted 
to catch him. Nat 'most dropped, it m.ade him so 
sick. His horse was put up, and he did n't know 
what U do. But just then along comes a darky 
driving an old ramshackly hack, and he see his 
chance. He rushes out and shouts: "A half a 
dollar if you git me to the Capitol in half an hour, 



TOM SEEKS NEW ADVENTURES. 15 

and a quarter extra if you do it in twenty min- 
utes ! " 

*' Done ! " says the darky. 

Nat he jumped in and slammed the door, and 
away they went a-ripping" and a-tearing over the 
roughest road a body ever see, and the racket of 
it was something awful. Nat passed his arms 
through the loops and hung on for life and death, 
but pretty soon the hack hit a rock and flew up 
in the air, and the bottom fell out, and when it 
come down Nat's feet was on the ground, and he 
see he w^as in the most desperate danger if he 
could n't keep up with the hack. He was horrible 
scared, but he laid into his work for all he was 
worth, and hung tight to the arm-loops and made 
his legs fairly fly. He yelled and shouted to the 
driver to stop, and so did the crowds along the 
street, for they could see his legs spinning along 
under the coach, and his head and shoulders bob- 
bing inside, through the window^s, and he was in 
awful danger ; but the more they all shouted the 
more the nigger whooped and yelled and lashed 
the horses and shouted, '' Don't you fret, I 's gwine 
to git you dah in time, boss ; I 's gwine to do it, 
sho' ! " for you see he thought they were all hur- 
rying him up, and of course he could n't hear 



l6  

anything for the racket he was making. And so 
they went ripping along, and everybody just pet- 
rified to see it ; and when they got to the Capitol 
at last it was the quickest trip that ever was made, 
and everybody said so. The horses laid down, 
and Nat dropped, all tuckered out, and he was 
all dust and rags and barefooted ; but he was in 
time and just in time, and caught the President 
and give hmi the letter, and everything was all 
right, and the President give him a free pardon 
on the spot, and Nat give the nigger two extra 
quarters instead of one because he could see that 
if he had n't had the hack he would n't 'a' got 
there in time, nor anywhere near it. 

It was a powerful good adventure, and Tom 
Sawyer had to work his bullet-wound mighty 
lively to hold his own against it. 

Well, by and by Tom's glory got to paling 
down gradu'ly, on account of other things turn- 
ing up for the people to talk about — first a horse- 
race, and on top of that a house afire, and on top 
of that the circus, and on top of that the eclipse ; 
and that started a revival, same as it always does, 
and by that time there was n't any more talk 
about Tom, so to speak, and you never see a per- 
son so sick and disgusted. 



TOM SEEKS NEW ADVENTURES. 1/ 

Pretty soon he got to worrying and fretting 

right along day in and day out, and when I 

asked him what was he in such a state about, he 

said it 'most broke his heart to think how time 

was sHpping away, and him getting older and 

older, and no wars breaking out and no way of 

making a name for himself that he could see. 

Now^ that is the w^ay boys is always thinking, but 

he was the first one I ever heard come out and 
say it. 

So then he set to work to get up a plan to make 
him celebrated ; and pretty soon he struck it, and 
offered to take me and Jim in. Tom Sawyer 
was always free and generous that way. There's 
a plenty of boys that 's mighty good and friendly 
\^^\^x\ y oti 've got a good thing, but when a good 
thing happens to come their way they don't say 
a word to you, and try to hog it all. That war n't 
ever Tom Sawyer's way, I can say that for him. 
There 's plenty of boys that will come han- 
kering and groveling around you when you 've 
got an apple, and beg the core off of you ; 
but when they 've got one, and you beg for the 
core and remind them how you give them a core 
one time, they say thank you 'most to death, but 
there ain't a-going to be no core. But I notice 



l8  

they always git come up with ; all you got to do 
is to wait. 

Well, we went out in the woods on the hill, 
and Tom told us what it was. It was a crusade. 

** What 's a crusade ?" I says. 

He looked scornful the way he 's always done 
when he w^as ashamed of a person, and says — 

" Huck Finn, do you mean to tell me you don't 
know what a crusade is ? " 

"No," says I, "I don't. And I don't care to, 
nuther. I 've lived till now and done without it, 
and had my health, too. But as soon as you tell 
me, I '11 know, and that 's soon enough. I don't 
see any use in finding out things and clogging 
up my head with them when I may n't ever 
have any occasion to use 'em. There was Lance 
Williams, he learned how to talk Choctaw here 
till one come and dug his grave for him. Now, 
then, what 's a crusade ? But I can tell you one 
thing before you begin ; if it 's a patent-right, 
there 's no money in it. Bill Thompson he — " 

'' Patent-right ! " says he. " I never see such 
an idiot. Why, a crusade is a kind of war." 

I thought he must be losing his mind. But no, 
he was in real earnest, and went right on, per- 
fectly ca'm : 




/- X 



TOM SEEKS NEW ADVENTURES. 21 

'' A crusade is a war to recover the Holy Land 
from the paynim." 

"Which Holy Land?" 

*' Why, the Holy Land — there ain't but one." 

" What do we want of it ?" 

*' Why, can't you understand ? It 's in the hands 
of the paynim, and it 's our duty to take it away 
from them." 

''How did we come to let them git hold of it ?" 

''We did n't come to let them git hold of it. 
They always had it." 

"Why, Tom, then it must belong to them, 
don't it?" 

" Why of course it does. Who said it did n't ? " 

I studied over it, but could n't seem to git at 
the right of it, no way. I says : 

" It 's too many for me, Tom Sawyer. If I had 
a farm and it was mine, and another person 
wanted it, would it be right for him to — " 

'' Oh, shucks ! you don't know enough to come 
in when it rains, Huck Finn. It ain't a farm, it 's 
entirely different. You see, it 's like this. They 
own the land, just the mere land, and that 's all 
they do own ; but it was our folks, our Jews and 
Christians, that made it holy, and so they 
have n't any business to be there defiling it. It 's 



22  

a shame, and we ought not to stand it a minute. 
We ought to march against them and take it 
away from them." 

" Why, it does seem to me it 's the most mixed- 
up thing I ever see ! Now if I had a farm and 
another person — " 

'' Don't I tell you it has n't got anything to do 
with farming ? Farming is business, just com- 
mon low-down business ; that 's all it is, it 's all 
you can say for it ; but this is higher, this is re- 
ligious, and totally different." 

'' Religious to go and take the land away from 
people that owns it?" 

'' Certainly ; it 's always been considered so." 

Jim he shook his head, and says : 

*' Mars Tom, I reckon dey 's a mistake about it 
somers — dey mos' sholy is. I 's religious myself, 
en I knows plenty religious people, but I hain't 
run across none dat acts like dat." 

It made Tom hot, and he says : 

''Well, it 's enough to make a body sick, such 
mullet-headed ignorance ! If either of you 'd read 
anything about history, you 'd know^ that Rich- 
ard Cur de Loon, and the Pope, and Godfrey de 
Bulleyn, and lots more of the most noble-hearted 
and pious people in the world, hacked and ham- 



TOM SEEKS NEW ADVENTURES. 23 

raered at the paynims for more than two hundred 
years trying to take their land away from them, 
and swum neck-deep in blood the whole time — 
and yet here 's a couple of sap-headed country 
yahoos out in the backwoods of Missouri, setting 
themselves up to know more about the rights 
and wrongs of it than they did ! Talk about 
cheek ! " 

Well, of course, that put a more different light 
on it, and me and Jim felt pretty cheap and ig- 
norant, and wished we had n't been quite so 
chipper. I could n't say nothing, and Jim he 
could n't for a while ; then he says : 

** Well, den, I reckon it 's all right ; beca'se ef 
dey did n't know, dey ain't no use for po' igno- 
rant folks like us to be trying to know ; en so, ef 
it 's our duty, we got to go en tackle it en do de 
bes' we can. Same time, I feel as sorry for dem 
paynims as Mars Tom. De hard part gwine to 
be to kill folks dat a body hain't been 'quainted 
wid and dat hain't done him no harm. Dat 's it, 
you see. Ef we wuz to go 'mongst 'em, jist we 
three, en say we 's hungry, en ast 'em for a bite 
to eat, why, maybe dey's jist like yuther people. 
Don't you reckon dey is ? Why, dey 'd give it, 
I know dey would, en den — " 



24  

''Then what?" 

" Well, Mars Tom, my idea is like dis. It ain't 
no use, we cant kill dem po' strangers dat ain't 
doin' us no harm, till we 've had practice — 1 
knows it perfectly well. Mars Tom — 'deed I 
knows it perfectly well. But ef we takes a' ax 
or two, jist you en me en Huck, en slips acrost 
de river to-night arter de moon 's gone down, en 
kills dat sick fam'ly dat 's over on the Sny, en 
burns dey house down, en — " 

'' Oh, you make me tired ! " says Tom. " I 
don't want to argue any more with people like 
you and Huck Finn, that 's always wandering 
from the subject, and ain't got any more sense 
than to try to reason out a thing that 's pure 
theology by the laws that protect real estate ! " 

Now that 's just where Tom Sawyer war n't 
fair. Jim did n't mean no harm, and I did n't 
mean no harm. We knowed well enough that 
he was right and we was wrong, and all we was 
after was to get at the hoiv of it, and that was 
all ; and the only reason he could n't explain it 
so we could understand it was because we was 
ignorant — yes, and pretty dull, too, I ain't deny- 
ing that ; but, land ! that ain't no crime, I should 
think. 



TOM SEEKS NEW ADVENTURES. 25 

But he would n't hear no more about it — just 
said if we had tackled the thin^ in the proper 
spirit, he would a' raised a couple of thousand 
knights and put them in steel armor from head 
to heel, and made me a lieutenant and Jim a sut- 
ler, and took the command himself and brushed 
the whole paynim outfit into the sea like flies and 
come back across the world in a glory like sun- 
set. But he said we did n't know enough to take 
the chance when we had it, and he would n't 
ever offer it again. And he did n't. When he 
once got set, you could n't budge him. 

But I did n't care much. I am peaceable, and 
don't get up rows with people that ain't doing 
nothing to me. I allowed if the paynim was 
satisfied I was, and we would let it stand at that. 

Now Tom he got all that notion out of Wal- 
ter Scott's book, which he was always reading. 
And it was a wild notion, because in my opinion 
he never could 've raised the men, and if he did, 
as like as not he would 've got licked. I took 
the books and read all about it, and as near as I 
could make it out, most of the folks that shook 
farming to go crusading had a mighty rocky 
time of it. 



CHAPTER II. 

THE BALLOON ASCENSION. 

Well, Tom got up one thing after another, 
but they all had tender spots about 'em some- 
wheres, and he had to shove em aside. So at 
last he was about in despair. Then the St. Louis 
papers begun to talk a good deal about the bal- 
loon that was going to sail to Europe, and Tom 
sort of thought he wanted to go down and see 
what it looked like, but could n't make up his 
mind. But the papers went on talking, and so 
he allowed that maybe if he did n't go he 
might n't ever have another chance to see a bal- 
loon; and next, he found out that Nat Parsons 
was going down to see it, and that decided him, 
of course. He was n't going to have Nat Parsons 
coming back bragging about seeing the balloon, 
and him having to listen to it and keep quiet. 
So he wanted me and Jim to go too, and we 
went. 

It was a noble big balloon, and had wings and 

fans and all sorts of things, and was n't like any 

26 




f 



THE BALLOON ASCENSION. 29 

balloon you see in pictures. It was away out 
tow^ard the edge of town, in a vacant lot, corner 
of Twelfth street ; and there was a big crowd 
around it, making fun of it, and making fun of 
the man, — a lean pale feller with that soft kind 
of moonlight in his eyes, you know, — and they 
kept saying it would n't go. It made him hot to 
hear them, and he would turn on them and 
shake his fist and say they was animals and 
blind, but some day they would find they had 
stood face to face with one of the men that lifts 
up nations and makes civilizations, and was too 
dull to know it; and right here on this spot their 
own children and grandchildren would build a 
monument to him that would outlast a thousand 
years, but his name would outlast the monu- 
ment. And then the crowed would burst out in 
a laugh again, and yell at him, and ask him what 
was his name before he w^as married, and what 
he would take to not do it, and what was his sis- 
ter's cat's grandmother's name, and all the 
things that a crowd says when they 've got hold 
of a feller that they see they can plague. Well, 
some things they said was funny, — yes, and 
mighty witty too, I ain't denying that, — but all 
the same it war n't fair nor brave, all them peo- 



30  

pie pitching on one, and they so glib and sharp, 
and him without any gift of talk to answer back 
with. But, good land ! what did he want to 
sass back for? You see, it could n't do him no 
good, and it was just nuts for them. They /lad 
him, you know. But that was his way. I 
reckon he could n't help it ; he was made so, I 
judge. He was a good-enough sort of cretur, and 
had n't no harm in him, and was just a genius, 
as the papers said, which was n't his fault. We 
can't all be sound : we 've got to be the way 
we 're made. As near as I can make out, gen- 
iuses think they know it all, and so they won't 
take people's advice, but always go their, own 
way, which makes everybody forsake them and 
despise them, and that is perfectly natural. If 
they was humbler, and listened and tried to 
learn, it would be better for them. 

The part the professor was in was like a boat, 
and was big and roomy, and had water-tight 
lockers around the inside to keep all sorts of 
things in, and a body could sit on them, and 
make beds on them, too. We went aboard, and 
there was twenty people there, snooping around 
and examining, and old Nat Parsons was there, 
too. The professor kept fussing around, getting 



THE BALLOON ASCENSION. 3 1 

ready, and the people went ashore, drifting- out 
one at a time, and old Nat he was the last. Of 
course it would n't do to let him go out behind 
us. We must n't budge till he was gone, so we 
could be last ourselves. 

But he was gone now, so it was time for us to 
follow. I heard a big shout, and turned around 
— the city was dropping from under us like a 
shot ! It made me sick all through, I was so 
scared. Jim turned gray and could n't say a 
word, and Tom did n't say nothing, but looked 
excited. The city went on dropping down, and 
down, and down; but we did n't seem to be do- 
ing nothing but just hang in the air and stand 
still. The houses got smaller and smaller, and the 
city pulled itself together, closer and closer, and 
the men and wagons got to looking like ants 
and bugs crawling around, and the streets like 
threads and cracks ; and then it all kind of 
melted together, and there was n't any city any 
more : it was only a big scar on the earth, and it 
seemed to me a body could see up the river and 
down the river about a thousand miles, though 
of course it was n't so much. By and by the 
earth was a ball — just a round ball, of a dull 
color, with shiny stripes wriggling and winding 



32  

around over it, which was rivers. The Widdet 
Doug-las always told me the earth was round 
like a ball, but I never took any stock in a lot of 
them superstitions o' hers, and of course I paid 
no attention to that one, because I could see my- 
self that the world was the shape of a plate, and 
flat. I used to go up on the hill, and take a look 
around and prove it for myself, because I reckon 
the best way to get a sure thing on a fact is to 
go and examine for yourself, and not take any- 
body's say-so. But I had to give in, now, that 
the widder was right. That is, she was right as 
to the rest of the world, but she war n't right 
about the part our village is m ; that part is the 
shape of a plate, and flat, I take my oath ! 

The professor had been quiet all this time, as 
if he was asleep ; but he broke loose now, and 
he was mighty bitter. He says something like 
this : 

*' Idiots ! They said it would n't go; and they 
wanted to examine it, and spy around and get 
the secret of it out of me. But I beat them. 
Nobody knows the secret but me. Nobody 
knows what makes it move but me; and it 's a 
new power — a new power, and a thousand times 
the strongest in the earth ! Steam 's foolishness 



THE BALLOON ASCENSION. 33 

to It ! They said I could n't go to Europe. To 
Europe ! Why, there 's power aboard to last five 
years, and feed for three months. They are fools ! 
What do they know about it ? Yes, and they said 
my air-ship was flimsy. Why, she 's good for 
fifty years ! I can sail the skies all my life if I 
want to, and steer where I please, though they 
laughed at that, and said I could n't. Could n't 
steer! Come here, boy; we'll see. You press 
these buttons as I tell you." 

He made Tom steer the ship all about and 
every which way, and learnt him the whole thing 
in nearly no time; and Tom said it was perfectly 
easy. He made him fetch the ship down 'most 
to the earth, and had him spin her along so close 
to the Illinois prairies that a body could talk to 
the farmers, and hear everything they said per- 
fectly plain; and he flung out printed bills to 
them that told about the balloon, and said it was 
going to Europe. Tom got so he could steer 
straight for a tree till he got nearly to it, and then 
dart up and skin right along over the top of it. 
Yes, and he showed Tom how to land her; and 
he done it first-rate, too, and set her down in the 
prairies as soft as wool. But the minute we 
started to skip out the professor says, " No, you 



34  

don't ! " and shot her up in the air again. It was 
awful. I begun to beg, and so did Jim; but it 
only give his temper a rise, and he begun to rage 
around and look wild out of his eyes, and I was 
scared of him. 

Well, then he got on to his troubles again, 
and mourned and grumbled about the way he 
was treated, and could n't seem to git over it, 
and especially people's saying his ship was flimsy. 
He scoffed at that, and at their saying she w^ar n't 
simple and would be always getting out of order. 
Get out of order ! That graveled him; he said 
that she could n't any more get out of order than 
the solar sister. 

He got worse and worse, and I never see a per- 
son take on so. It g^ive me the cold shivers to 
see him, and so it did Jim. By and by he got to 
yelling and screaming, and then he swore the 
world should n't ever have his secret at all now, 
it had treated him so mean. He said he would 
sail his balloon around the globe just to show 
what he could do, and then he would sink it in 
the sea, and sink us all along with it, too. Well, 
it was the awfullest fix to be in, and here was 
night coming on ! 

He give us something to eat, and made us go 




"AND HERE WAS NIGHT COMING ON! 



THE BALLOON ASCENSION. 37 

to the other end of the boat, and he laid down on 
a locker, where he could boss all the works, and 
put his old pepper-box revolver under his head, 
and said if anybody come fooling around there 
trying to land her, he would kill him. 

We set scrunched up together, and thought con- 
siderable, but did n't say much — only just a word 
once in a while when a body had to say some- 
thing or bust, we was so scared and worried, 
The nicrht drao:o:ed alon<^ slow and lonesome. 
We was pretty low down, and the moonshine 
made everything soft and pretty, and the farm- 
houses looked snug and homeful, and we could 
hear, the farm sounds, and wished we could be 
down there; but, laws! we just slipped along 
over them like a orhost, and never left a 
track. 

Aw^ay in the night, when all the sounds w^as 
late sounds, and the air had a late feel, and a late 
smell, too, — about a two-o'clock feel, as near as I 
could make out, — Tom said the professor was so 
quiet this time he must be asleep, and we 'd bet- 
ter — 

"Better w^hat?" I says in a whisper, and feel- 
ing sick all over, because I knowed what he was 
thinking- about. 



38  

" Better slip back there and tie him, and land 
the ship," he says. 

I says: *'No, sir! Don't you budge, Tom 
Sawyer." 

And Jim — well, Jim was kind o' gasping, he 
was so scared. He says: 

** Oh, Mars Tom, doiitf Ef you teches him, 
we 's gone — we 's gone sho' ! I ain't gvvine anear 
him, not for nothin' in dis worl'. Mars Tom, he 's 
plumb crazy." 

Tom w^hispers and says: "That 's why we 've 
got to do something. If he was n't crazy I 
would n't give shucks to be anywhere but here; 
you could n't hire me to get out, — now that I 've 
got used to this balloon and over the scare of 
being cut loose from the solid ground, — if he was 
in his right mind. But it 's no good politics, sail- 
ing around like this with a person that 's out of 
his head, and says he 's going round the world 
and then drown us all. We '\^ got to do some- 
thing, I tell you, and do it before he wakes up, 
too, or we may n't ever get another chance. 
Come ! " 

But it made us turn cold and creepy just to 
think of it, and we said we would n't budge. So 
Tom was for slipping back there by himself to 



THE BALLOON ASCENSION. 39 

see if he could n't get at the steering-gear and 
land the ship. We begged and begged him not 
to, but it war n't no use; so he got down on his 
hands and knees, and begun to crawl an uich at 
a time, we a-holding our breath and w^atching. 
After he got to the middle of the boat he crept 
slower than ever, and it did seem like years to me. 
But at last w^e see him get to the professor's head, 
and sort of raise up soft and look a good spell in 
his face and listen. Then we see him begin to 
inch along again toward the professor's feet 
where the steering-buttons was. Well, he got 
there all safe, and was reaching slow and steady 
toward the buttons, but he knocked down some- 
thing that made a noise, and we see him slump 
down flat an' soft in the bottom, and lay still. 
The professor stirred, and says, *'W^hat 'sthat?" 
But everybody kept dead still and quiet, and he 
begun to mutter and mumble and nestle, like a 
person that 's going to wake up, and I thought I 
was going to die, I was so worried and scared. 

Then a cloud slid over the moon, and I 'most 
cried, I was so glad. She buried herself deeper 
and deeper into the cloud, and it got so dark we 
could n't see Tom. Then it began to sprinkle rain, 
and we could hear the professor fussing at his 



40  

ropes and things and abusing the weather. We 
was afraid every minute he would touch Tom, 
and then we would be goners, and no help; but 
Tom was already on his way back, and when w^e 
felt his hands on our knees my breath stopped 
sudden, and my heart fell down 'mongst my 
other works, because I could n't tell in the dark 
but it might be the professor, which I thought 
it was. 

Dear ! I was so glad to have him back that I 
was just as near happy as a person could be that 
was up in the air that way with a deranged man. 
You can't land a balloon in the dark, and so I 
hoped it would keep on raining, for I did n't 
want Tom to go meddling any more and make 
us so awful uncomfortable. Well, I got my 
wish. It drizzled and drizzled along the rest of 
the night, which was n't long, though it did seem 
so; and at daybreak it cleared, and the world 
looked mighty soft and gray and pretty, and the 
forests and fields so good to see again, and the 
horses and cattle standing sober and thinking. 
Next, the sun come a-blazing up gay and splen- 
did, and then we began to feel rusty and stretchy, 
and first we knowed we was all asleep. 



CHAPTER IIL 

TOM EXPLAINS. 

We went to sleep about four o'clock, and woke 
up about eight. The professor was setting- back 
there at his end, looking glum. He pitched us 
some breakfast, but he told us not to come abaft 
the midship compass. That was about the mid- 
dle of the boat. Well, when you are sharp-set, 
and you eat and satisfy yourself, everything 
looks pretty different from what it done before. 
It makes a body feel pretty near comfortable, 
even when he is up in a balloon with a genius. 
We got to talking together. 

There was one thing that kept bothering me, 
and by and by I says : 

"Tom., did n't we start east ?" 

"Yes." 

" How fast have we been oroinor ?" 

" Well, you heard what the professor said when 
he w^as raging round. Sometimes, he said, we 
was making fifty miles an hour, sometimes ninety, 
sometimes a hundred ; said that with a gale to 
help he could make three hundred any time, and 



42  

said if he wanted the gale, and wanted it blow- 
ing the right direction, he only had to go up 
higher or down lower to find it." 

''Well, then, it 's just as I reckoned. The pro- 
fessor lied." 

-Why?" 

'' Because if we was going so fast we ought to 
be past Illinois, ought n't we ?" 

'' Certainly." 

'' Well, we ain't." 

" What 's the reason w^e ain't ?" 

'' I know by the color. We 're right over Illi- 
nois yet. And you can see for yourself that 
Indiana ain't in sight." 

" I wonder what 's the matter with you, Huck. 
You know by the color?'''' 

'' Yes, of course I do." 

"What 's the color got to do with it?" 

'* It 's got everything to do with it. Illinois is 
green, Indiana is pink. You show me any pink 
down here, if you can. No, sir ; it 's green." 

'' Indiana pink ? Why, what a lie ? " 

" It ain't no lie ; I 've seen it on the map, and 
it 's pink." 

You never see a person so aggravated and dis- 
gusted. He says : 



TOM EXPLAINS. 43 

"Well, if I was such a numskull as you, Huck 
Finn, I would jump over. Seen it on the map ! 
Huck Finn, did you reckon the States was the 
same color out of doors as they are on the map ? " 

'• Tom Sawyer, what 's a map for ? Ain't it to 
learn you facts ? " 

"Of course." 

" Well, then, how 's it going to do that if it tells 
lies ? That 's what I want to know." 

" Shucks, you muggins ! It don't tell lies." 

"It don't, don't it?" 

"No, it don't." 

" All right, then ; if it don't, there ain't no two 
States the same color. You git around that, if 
you can, Tom Sawyer." 

He see I had him, and Jim see it too ; and 
I tell you, I felt pretty good, for Tom Sawyer 
was always a hard person to git ahead of. Jim 
slapped his leg and says : 

"I tell yo2tI dat 's smart, dat 's right down 
smart. Ain't no use. Mars Tom ; he got you dis 
time, sho ! " He slapped his leg again, and says, 
" My laii , but it was smart one ! " 

I never felt so good in my life ; and yet / 
did n't know I was saying anything much till it 
was out. I was just mooning along, perfectly 



44  

careless, and not expecting anything was going 
to happen, and never thinking of such a thing at 
all, when, all of a sudden, out it come. Why, it 
was just as much a surprise to me as it was to 
any of them. It was just the same way it is when 
a person is munching along on a hunk of corn- 
pone, and not thinking about anything, and all 
of a sudden bites into a di'mond. Now all that 
he knows first off is that it 's some kind of gravel 
he 's bit into ; but he don't find out it 's a di'mond 
till he gits it out and brushes off the sand and 
crumbs and one thing or another, and has a look 
at it, and then he 's surprised and glad — yes, and 
proud too ; though when you come to look the 
thing straight in the eye, he ain't entitled to as 
much credit as he would 'a' been if he 'd been 
Jiiinting di'monds. You can see the difl'erence 
easy if you think it over. You see, an accident, 
that way, ain't fairly as big a thing as a thing 
that 's done a-purpose. Anybody could find that 
di'mond in that corn-pone ; but mind you, it 's 
got to be somebody that 's got that kind of a corn- 
pone. That 's where that feller's credit comes in, 
you see ; and that 's where mine comes in. I 
don't claim no great things, — I don't reckon I 
could 'a' done it ao^ain, — but I done it that time ; 



TOM EXPLAINS. 45 

that 's all I claim. And I had n't no more idea I 
could do such a thing-, and war n't any more 
thinking- about it or trying to, than you be this 
minute. Why, I was just as cam, a body could n't 
be any cammer, and yet, all of a sudden, out it 
come. I 've often thought of that time, and 1 
can remember just the way everything looked, 
same as if it was only last week. I can see it all : 
beautiful rolling country with woods and fields 
and lakes for hundreds and hundreds of miles all 
around, and towns and villages scattered every- 
wheres under us, here and there and yonder ; and 
the professor mooning over a chart on his little 
table, and Tom's cap flopping in the rigging 
where it was hung up to dry. And one thing in 
particular was a bird right alongside, not ten foot 
off, going our way and trying to keep up, but 
losing ground all the time ; and a railroad train 
doing the same thing down there, sliding among 
the trees and farms, and pouring out a long cloud 
of black smoke and now and then a little puff of 
white ; and when the white was gone so long 
you had almost forgot it, you would hear a little 
faint toot, and that was the whistle. And we 
left the bird and the train both behind, 'way be- 
hind, and done it easy too. 



46  

But Tom he was huffy, and said me and Jim 
was a couple of ignorant blatherskites, and then 
he says : 

'' Suppose there 's a brown calf and a big brown 
dog, and an artist is making a picture of them. 
What is the main thing that that artist has got to 
do ? He has got to paint them so you can tell 
them apart the minute you look at them, hain't 
he ? Of course. Well, then, do you want him 
to go and paint both of them brown ? Certainly 
you don't. He paints one of them blue, and then 
you can*t make no mistake. It 's just the same 
with the maps. That 's why they make every 
State a different color ; it ain't to deceive you, 
it 's to keep you from deceiving yourself." 

But I could n't see no argument about that, and 
neither could Jim. Jim shook his head, and says : 

" Why, Mars Tom, if you knowed what chuckle- 
heads dem painters is, you 'd wait a long time 
before you 'd fetch one er dem in to back up a 
fac'. I 's gwine to tell you, den you kin see for 
youself. I see one of 'em a-paintin' away, one 
day, down in ole Hank Wilson's back lot, en I 
went down to see, en he was paintin' dat old 
brindle cow wid de near horn gone — you knows 
de one I means. En I ast him what he 's paintin' 



TOM EXPLAINS. 47 

her for, en he say when he git her painted, de 
picture 's wuth a hundred dollars. Mars Tom, 
he could a got de cow fer fifteen, en I tole him 
so. Well, sah, if you '11 b'lieve me, he jes' shuck 
his head, dat painter did, en went on a-dobbin'. 
Bless you. Mars Tom, dey don't know nothin'." 

Tom he lost his temper. I notice a person 
'most always does that 's got laid out in an argu- 
ment. He told us to shut up, and maybe we 'd 
feel better. Then he see a town clock away off 
down yonder, and he took up the glass and 
looked at it, and then looked at his silver turnip, 
and then at the clock, and then at the turnip 
again, and says : 

''That 's funny! That clock 's near about an 
hour fast." 

So he put up his turnip. Then he see another 
clock, and took a look, and it was an hour fast 
too. That puzzled him. 

*' That 's a mighty curious thing,'' he says. " I 
don't understand it." 

Then he took the glass and hunted up another 
clock, and sure enough it was an hour fast too. 
Then his eyes began to spread and his breath to 
come out kinder gaspy like, and he says : 

*' Ger-reat Scott, it 's the longitude T^ 



48  

I says, considerably scared : 

'* Well, what 's been and gone and happened 
now?" 

"Why, the thing that 's happened is that this 
old bladder has slid over Illinois and Indiana and 
Ohio like nothing, and this is the east end of 
Pennsylvania or New York, or somewheres 
around there." 

** Tom Sawyer, you don't mean it ! " 

"Yes, I do, and it 's dead sure. We 've cov- 
ered about fifteen degrees of longitude since we 
left St. Louis yesterday afternoon, and them 
clocks are right. We 've come close on to eight 
hundred miles." 

I did n't believe it, but it made the cold streaks 
trickle down my back just the same. In my ex- 
perience I knowed it would, n't take much short 
of two weeks to do it down the Mississippi on a 
raft. 

Jim was working his mind and studying. 
Pretty soon he says : 

" Mars Tom, did you say dem clocks uz right ? " 

" Yes, they 're right." 

" Ain't yo' watch right, too ? " 

" She 's right for St. Louis, but she 's an hour 
wrono- for here." 







YOU WANT TO LEAVE ME. DOM'T TRY TO DENY IT. 



TOM EXPLAINS. $1 

"Mars Tom, is you tryin' to let on dat cle time 
ain't cle same everywheres ?" 

" No, it ain't the same everywheres, by a long 
shot." 

Jim looked distressed, and says : 

'* It grieves me to hear you talk like dat, Mars 
Tom ; I 's right down ashamed to hear you talk 
like dat, arter de way you 's been raised. Yassir, 
it 'd break yo' Aunt Polly's heart to hear you." 

Tom was astonished. He looked Jim over, 
wondering, and did n't say nothing, and Jim 
went on : 

*' Mars Tom, who put de people out yonder in 
St. Louis ? De Lord done it. Who put de people 
here whar we is ? De Lord done it. Ain' dey 
bofe his children ? 'Cose dey is. Well, den ! is 
he gwine to scriminate 'twixt 'em ? " 

" Scriminate ! I never heard such ignorance. 
There ain't no discriminating about it. When he 
makes you and some more of his children black, 
and makes the rest of us white, what do you call 
that ? " 

Jim see the p'int. He was stuck. He could n't 
answer. Tom says : 

" He does discriminate, you see, when he wants 
to ; but this case here ain't no discrimination of 



52  

his, it 's man's. The Lord made the day, and he 
made the night ; but he did n't invent the hours, 
and he didn't distribute them around. Man did 
that." 

** Mars Tom, is dat so ? Man done it ?" 

" Certainly." 

'* Who tole him he could ?" 

" Nobody. He never asked." 

Jim studied a minute, and says : 

" Well, dat do beat me. I would n't 'a' tuck 
no sich resk. But some people ain't scared o' 
nothin'. Dey bangs right ahead ; dey don't care 
what happens. So den dey 's allays an hour's 
diff 'unce every whah. Mars Tom ? " 

" An hour ? No ! It 's four minutes difference 
for every degree of longitude, you know. Fif- 
teen of 'em 's an hour, thirty of 'em 's two hours, 
and so on. When it 's one o'clock Tuesday morn- 
ing in England, it 's eight o'clock the night before 
in New York." 

Jim moved a little way along the locker, and 
you could see he was insulted. He kept shaking 
his head and muttering, and so I slid along to 
him and patted him on the leg, and petted him 
up, and got him over the worst of his feelings, 
and then he says : 



TOM EXPLAINS. 53 

'' Mars Tom talkin' sich talk as dat ! Choosday 
in one place en Monday in t' other, bofe in the 
same day! Huck, dis ain't no place to joke — 
up here whah we is. Two days in one day ! How 
you g-wine to got two days inter one day ? Can't 
git two hours inter one hour, kin you ? Can't git 
two niggers inter one nigger skin, kin you ? Can't 
git two gallons of whisky inter a one-gallon jug, 
kin you ? No, sir, 't would strain de jug. Yes, 
en even den you could n't, /don't believe. Why, 
looky here, Huck, s'posen de Choosday was New 
Year's — now den ! is you gwine to tell me it 's 
dis year in one place en las' year in t' other, bofe 
in d€ identical same minute ? It 's de beatenest 
rubbage ! I can't stan' it — I can't stan' to hear 
tell 'bout it." Then he begun to shiver and turn 
gray, and Tom says : 

" Now wha.t 's the matter? What 's the trou- 
ble?" 

Jim could hardly speak, but he says : 

'* Mars Tom, you ain't jokin', en it 's so .^" 

" No I'm not, and it z's so." 

Jim shivered again, and says : 

" Den dat Monday could be de las' day, en dey 
would n't be no las' day in England, en de dead 
would n't be called. We must n't go over dah, 



54  

Mars Tom. Please git him to turn back ; I wants 
to be whah — " 

All of a sudden we see something, and all 
jumped up, and forgot everything and begun to 
gaze. Tom says : 

*' Ain't that the — " He catched his breath, 
then says: '* It 2V, sure as you live ! It 's the ocean !" 

That made me and Jim catch our breath, too. 
Then we all stood petrified but happy, for none 
of us had ever seen an ocean, or ever expected 
to. Tom kept muttering : 

''Atlantic Ocean — Atlantic. Land, don't it 
sound great ! And that 's it — and zve are look- 
ing at it — we! Why, it 's just too splendid to 
believe ! " 

Then we see a big bank of black smoke ; and 
when we got nearer, it was a city — and a mon- 
ster she was, too, with a thick fringe of ships 
around one edge ; and we wondered if it was 
New York, and begun to jaw and dispute about 
it, and, first we knowed, it slid from under us and 
went flying behind, and here we was, out over 
the very ocean itself, and going like a cyclone. 
Then we woke up, I tell you ! 

We made a break aft and raised a wail, and 
begun to beg the professor to turn back and land 



TOM EXPLAINS. 55 

US, but he jerked out his pistol and motioned us 
back, and we went, but nobody will ever know 
how bad we felt. 

The land was gone, all but a little streak, Uke 
a snake, away off on the edge of the water, and 
down under us was just ocean, ocean, ocean — - 
millions of miles of it, heaving and pitching and 
squirming, and white sprays blowing from the 
w^ave-tops, and only a few ships in sight, wallow- 
ing around and laying over, first on one side 
and then on t' other, and sticking their bows un- 
der and then their sterns ; and before long there 
war n't no ships at all, and we had the sky and 
the whole ocean all to ourselves, and the room- 
iest place I ever see and the lonesomest. 



CHAPTER IV. 

STORM. 

And it got lonesomer and lonesomer. There 
was the big sky up there, empty and awful deep; 
and the ocean down there without a things on it 
but just the waves. All around us was a ring-, 
where the sky and the water come together ; yes, 
a monstrous big ring it was, and we right in the 
dead center of it — plumb in the center. We was 
racing along like a prairie fire, but it never made 
any difference, we could n't seem to git past that 
center no way. I could n't see that we ever 
gained an inch on that ring. It made a body 
feel creepy, it was so curious and unaccountable. 

Well, everything was so awful still that we got 
to talking in a very low voice, and kept on get- 
ting creepier and lonesomer and less and less 
talky, till at last the talk ran dry altogether, and 
we just set there and '' thunk," as Jim calls it, and 
never said a word the longest time. 

The professor never stirred till the sun was 

overhead, then he stood up and put a kind of 

56 




THE PROFESSOR SAID HE WOULD KEEP UP THIS HUNDRED-MILE 
GAIT TILL TO-MORROW." 



STORM. 59 

triangle, to his eye, and Tom said it was a sextant 
and he was taking the sun to see whereabouts 
the balloon was. Then he ciphered a little and 
looked in a book, and then he begun to carry on 
again. He said lots of wild things, and amongst 
others he said he would keep up this hundred- 
mile gait till the middle of to-morrow^ afternoon, 
and then he'd land in London. 

We said we w ould be humbly thankful. 

He was turning away, but he whirled around 
w hen we said that, and give us a long look of his 
blackest kind — one of the maliciousest and sus- 
piciousest looks I ever see. Then he says : 

'* Vou want to leave me. Don't try to deny it." 

We did n't know what to say, so we held in 
and didn't say nothing at all. 

He went aft and set dow-n, but he could n't 
seem to git that thing out of his mind. Every 
now and then he w^ould rip out something about 
it, and try to make us answ^er him, but we das n't. 

It got lonesomer and lonesomer right along, 
and it did seem to me I could n't stand it. It 
was still worse when night begun to come on. 
By and by Tom pinched me and whispers : 

'' Look ! " 

I took a glance aft, and see the professor tak- 



6o  

ing- a whet out of a bottle. I did n't like the 
looks of that. By and by he took another drink, 
and pretty soon he begun to sing. It was dark 
now, and getting black and stormy. He went 
on singing, wilder and wilder, and the thunder 
begun to mutter, and the wind to wheeze and 
moan amongst the ropes, and altogether it was 
awful. It got so black we could n't see him any 
more, and wished we could n't hear him, but we 
could. Then he got still ; but he war n't still ten 
minutes till we got suspicious, and wished he 
would start up his noise again, so we could tell 
where he was. By and by there was a flash of 
lightning, and we see him start to get up, but he 
staggered and fell down. We heard him scream 
out in the dark : 

''They don't want to go to England. All 
right, I 11 change the course. They want to 
leave me. I know they do. Well, they shall — 
and nozu /'' 

I 'most died when he said that. Then he 
was still again, — still so long I could n't bear it, 
and it did seem to me the lightning would n't 
evei- come again. But at last there was a blessed 
flash, and there he was, on his hands and knees, 
crawling, and not four feet from us. My, but 




THE THUNDER BOOMED, AND THE LIGHTNING GLARED, AND THE 
WIND SCREAMED IN THE RIGGING." 



STORM. 63 

his eyes was terrible ! He made a lunge for 
Tom, and says, " Overboard yoii. go ! " but it 
was already pitch-dark again, and I could n't 
see whether he got him or not, and Tom did n't 
make a sound. 

There was another long, horrible wait ; then 
there was a flash, and I see Tom's head sink 
down outside the boat and disappear. He was 
on the rope-ladder that dangled down in the air 
from the gunnel. The professor let off a shout 
and jumped for him, and straight off it was 
pitch-dark again, and Jim groaned out, '* Po' 
Mars Tom, he 's a goner ! " and made a jump 
for the professor, but the professor war n't there. 

Then we heard a couple of terrible screams, 
and then another not so loud, and then another 
that was 'way below, and you could only just 
hear it ; and I heard Jim say, " Po' Mars Tom ! " 

Then it was awful still, and I reckon a person 
could 'a' counted four thousand before the next 
flash come. When it come I see Jim on his 
knees, with his arms on the locker and his face 
buried in them, and he was crying. Before I 
could look over the edge it was all dark again, 
and I was glad, because I did n't want to see. 
But when the next flash come, I was watching, 



64  

and down there I see somebody a-swinging in 
the wind on the ladder, and it was Tom ! 

'* Come up !'' I shouts ; '' come up, Tom ! " 

His voice was so weak, and the wind roared 
so, I could n't make out what he said, but 1 
thought he asked was the professor up there. I 
shouts : 

'* No, he 's down in the ocean ! Come up ! 
Can we help you ?" 

Of course, all this in the dark. 

'* Huck, who is you hollerin' at ? " 

** I 'm hollerin' at Tom." 

"Oh, Huck, how kin you act so, when you 
know po' Mars Tom 's — " Then he let off an 
awful scream, and flung his head and his arms 
back and let off another one, because there was 
a white glare just then, and he had raised up his 
face just in time to see Tom's, as white as snow, 
rise above the gunnel and look him right in the 
eye. He thought it was Tom's ghost, you see. 

Tom dumb aboard, and when Jim found it 
was him, and not his ghost, he hugged him, and 
called him all sorts of loving names, and carried 
on like he was gone crazy, he was so glad. Says I : 

" What did you wait for, Tom ? Why did n't 
you come up at first ? " 



STORM. 65 

** I das n't, Huck. I knowed somebody 
plunged down past me, but I did n't know who 
it was in the dark. It could 'a' been you, it 
could 'a' been Jim." 

That was the way with Tom Sawyer — always 
sound. He war n't coming up till he knowed 
where the professor was. 

The storm let go about this time with all its 
might ; and it was dreadful the way the thunder 
boomed and tore, and the lightning glared out, 
and the wind sung and screamed in the rigging, 
and the rain come down. One second you 
could n't see your hand before you, and the next 
you could count the threads in your coat-sleeve, 
and see a whole wide desert of waves pitching 
and tossing through a kind of veil of rain. A 
storm like that is the loveliest thing there is, but 
it ain't at its best when you are up in the sky 
and lost, and it 's wet and lonesome, and there 's 
just been a death in the family. 

We set there huddled up in the bow, and 
talked low about the poor professor ; and every- 
body was sorry for him, and sorry the world 
had made fun of him and treated him so harsh, 
when he was doing the best he could, and had 
n't a friend nor nobody to encourage him and 



66  

keep him from brooding his mind away and 
going" deranged. There was plenty of clothes 
and blankets and everything at the other end, 
but we thought we 'd ruther take the rain than 
go meddling back there. 



CHAPTER V. 

LAND. 

We tried to make some plans, but we could n't 
come to no agreement. Me and Jim was for 
turning around and going back home, but Tom 
allowed that by the time daylight come, so we 
could see our way, we would be so far toward 
England that we might as well go there, and 
come back in a ship, and have the glory of say- 
ing we done it. 

About midnight the storm quit and the moon 
come out and lit up the ocean, and we begun to 
feel comfortable and drowsy ; so we stretched 
out on the lockers and went to sleep, and never 
woke up again till sun-up. The sea was spark- 
ling like di'monds, and it was nice weather, and 
pretty soon our things was all dry again. 

We went aft to find some breakfast, and the 
first thing we noticed was that there was a dim 
light burning in a compass back there under a 
hood. Then Tom was disturbed. He says : 

'* You know what that means, easy enough. 

67 



68  

It means that somebody has got to stay on 
watch and steer this thing the same as he would 
a ship, or she '11 wander around and go wherever 
the wind wants her to." 

''Well," I says, '' what 's she been doing since 
— er — since we had the accident ? " 

" Wandering," he says, kinder troubled — 
*' wandering, without any doubt. She 's in a 
wind, now, that 's blowing her south of east. 
We don't know how long that 's been going on, 
either." 

So then he p'inted her east, and said he would 
hold her there till we rousted out the breakfast. 
The professor had laid in everything a body 
could want ; he could n't 'a' been better fixed. 
There was n't no milk for the coffee, but there 
was water, and everything else you could want, 
and a charcoal stove and the fixings for it, and 
pipes and cigars and matches ; and wine and 
liquor, which war n't in our line ; and books, and 
maps, and charts, and an accordion ; and furs, 
and blankets, and no end of rubbish, like brass 
beads and brass jewelry, which Tom said was a 
sure sign that he had an idea of visiting among 
savages. There was money, too. Yes, the pro- 
fessor was well enough fixed. 



\ i i 



mmi 



4 



\}^M^-' 



il 




i'' m 



Wllil 



t 



1" ' i 



LAND. 71 

After breakfast Tom learned me and Jim how 
to steer, and divided us all up into four-hour 
watches, turn and turn about ; and when his 
watch w^as out I took his place, and he got out 
the professor's papers and pens and wrote a let- 
ter home to his Aunt Polly, telling her every- 
thing that had happened to us, and dated it ''In 
the Welkin, approaching England^' and folded it 
together and stuck it fast with a red wafer, and 
directed it, and wrote above the direction, in 
big writing, '' From Tom Sawyer, the Err on or t,' 
and said it would stump old Nat Parsons, the 
postmaster, when it come along in the mail. I 
say^ : 

" Tom Sawyer, this ain't no welkin ; it 's a bal- 
loon." 

*' Well, now, who said It was a welkin, 
smarty ? " 

*' You 've wrote it on the letter, anyway." 

''What of it? That don't mean that the bal- 
loon 's the welkin." 

''Oh, I thought it did. Well, then, what is a 
welkin?" 

I see in a minute he was stuck. He raked 
and scraped around in his mind, but he could n't 
find nothing, so he had to say : 



72  

''/don't know, and nobody don't know. It 's 
just a word, and it 's a mighty good word, too. 
There ain't many that lays over it. I don't be- 
heve there 's afiy that does." 

'' Shucks ! " I says. '' But what does it mean? 
—that 's the p'int." 

** /don't know what it means, I tell you. It 's 
a word that people uses for — for — well, it 's 
ornamental. They don't put ruffles on a shirt to 
keep a person warm, do they ? " 

" Course they don't." 

" But they put them on, don't they ?" 

'' Yes." 

'' All right, then ; that letter I wrote is a shirt, 
and the wxlkin 's the ruffle on it." 

I judged that that would gravel Jim, and it did. 

'' Now, Mars Tom, it ain't no use to talk like 
dat ; en, moreover, it 's sinful. You know^s a let- 
ter ain't no shirt, en dey ain't no ruffles on it, 
nuther. Dey ain't no place to put 'em on ; you 
can't put 'em on, and dey would n't stay ef you 
did." 

"Oh, do shut up, and wait till something 's 
started that you know something about." 

*' Why, Mars Tom, sholy you can't mean to 
say I don't know about shirts, when, goodness 



LAND. 73 

knows, I 's toted home de washin' ever sence — " 

*' I tell you, this has n't got anything to do 
with shirts. I only — " 

'' Why, Mars Tom, you said yo'self dat a let- 
ter — " 

*' Do you want to drive me crazy ? Keep still. 
I only used it as a metaphor." 

That word kinder bricked us up for a minute. 
Then Jim says — rather timid, because he see 
Tom was getting pretty tetchy : 

'' Mars Tom, what is a metaphor ? " 

'* A metaphor 's a — well, it 's a — a — a meta- 
phor 's an illustration," He see that did n't git 
honie, so he tried again. ''When I say birds of 
a feather flocks together, it 's a metaphorical 
way of saying — " 

'' But dey dont, Mars Tom. No, sir, 'deed 
dey don't. Dey ain't no feathers dat 's more 
alike den a bluebird en a jaybird, but ef you 
waits till you catches dem birds together, 
you '11—" 

" Oh, give us a rest ! You can't get the sim- 
plest little thing through your thick skull. Now 
don't bother me any more." 

Jim was satisfied to stop. He was dreadful 
pleased with himself for catching Tom out. 



74  

The minute Tom begun to talk about birds I 
judged he was a goner, because Jim knowed 
more about birds than both of us put together. 
You see, he had killed hundreds and hundreds 
of them, and that s the way to find out about 
birds. That 's the way people does that writes 
books about birds, and loves them so that 
they '11 go hungry and tired and take any 
amount of trouble to find a new bird and kill 
it. Their name is ornithologers, and I could 
have been an ornithologer myself, because I 
always loved birds and creatures ; and I started 
out to learn how to be one, and I see a bird 
setting on a limb of a high tree, singing with its 
head tilted back and its mouth open, and before 
I thought I fired, and his song stopped and he 
fell straight down from the limb, all limp like a 
rag, and I run and picked him up and he was 
dead, and his body was warm in my hand, and 
his head rolled about this way and that, like his 
neck was broke, and there was a little white 
skin over his eyes, and one little drop of blood 
on the side of his head ; and, laws ! I could n't 
see nothing more for the tears ; and I hain't 
never murdered no creature since that war n't 
doing me no harm, and I ain't going to. 



LAND. 75 

But I was aggravated about that welkin. I 
wanted to know. I got the subject up again, 
and then Tom explained, the best he could. 
He said when a person made a big speech the 
newspapers said the shouts of the people made 
the welkin ring. He said they always said that, 
but none of them ever told what it was, so he 
allowed it just meant outdoors and up high. 
Well, that seemed sensible enough, so I was 
satisfied, and said so. That pleased Tom and 
put him in a good humor again, and he says : 

''Well, it 's all right, then; and we '11 let by- 
gones be bygones. I don't know for certain 
what a welkin is, but when we land in London 
we '11 make it ring, anyway, and don't you for- 
get it." 

He said an erronort was a person who sailed 
around in balloons; and said it was a mighty 
sight finer to be Tom Sawyer the Erronort than 
to be Tom Sawyer the Traveler, and we would 
be heard of all round the world, if we pulled 
through all right, and so he would n't give 
shucks to be a traveler now. 

Toward the middle of the afternoon we got 
everything ready to land, and we felt pretty 
good, too, and proud; and we kept watching 



7^  

with the glasses, Hke Columbus discoveruig 
America. But we could n't see nothing but 
ocean. The afternoon wasted out and the sun 
shut down, and still there war n't no land any- 
wheres. We wondered what was the matter, 
but reckoned it would come out all right, so we 
went on steering east, but went up on a higher 
level so we would n't hit any steeples or moun- 
tains in the dark. 

It was my watch till midnight, and then it was 
Jim's; but Tom stayed up, because he said ship- 
captains done that when they was making the 
land, and did n't stand no regular watch. 

Well, when daylight come, Jim give a shout, 
and we jumped up and looked over, and there 
was the land sure enough, — land all around, as 
far as you could see, and perfectly level and yal- 
ler. We did n't know how long we 'd been over 
it. There war n't no trees, nor hills, nor rocks, 
nor towns, and Tom and Jim had took it for the 
sea. They took it for the sea in a dead cam; 
but we was so high up, anyway, that if it had 
been the sea and rough, it would 'a' looked 
smooth, all the same, in the night, that way. 

We was all in a powerful excitement now, and 
grabbed the glasses and hunted everywheres for 




AND THERE WAS THE LION, A-RIPPING AROUND UNDER ME. 



LAND. 79 

London, but could n't find hair nor hide of it, 
nor any other settlement, — nor any sign of a lake 
or a river, either. Tom was clean beat. He said 
it war n't his notion of England; he thought 
England looked like America, and always had 
that idea. So he said we better have breakfast, 
and then drop down and inquire the quickest 
way to London. We cut the breakfast pretty 
short, we was so impatient. As we slanted along 
down, the weather began to moderate, and pretty 
soon we shed our furs. But it kept on moderat- 
ing, and in a precious little while it was 'most 
too moderate. We was close down, now, and 
just blistering! 

We settled down to within thirty foot of the 
land, — that is, it was land if sand is land; for 
this was n't anything but pure sand. Tom and 
me dumb down the ladder and took a run to 
stretch our legs, and it felt amazing good, — that 
is, the stretching did, but the sand scorched our 
feet like hot embers. Next, w^e see somebody 
coming, and started to meet him; but we heard 
Jim shout, and looked around and he w^as fairly 
dancing, and making signs, and yeUing. We 
could n't make out what he said, but we was 
scared anyway, and begun to heel it back to the 



So  

balloon. When we got close enough, we under- 
stood the words, and they made me sick: 

''Run! Run fo' yo' life! Hit 's a lion; I kin 
see him thoo de glass ! Run, boys; do please 
heel it de bes' you kin. He 's bu'sted outen de 
menagerie, en dey ain't nobody to stop him ! " 

It made Tom fly, but it took the stifl'ening all 
out of my legs. I could only just gasp along 
the way you do in a dream when there 's a ghost 
gaining on you. 

Tom got to the ladder and shinned up it a 
piece and waited for me; and as soon as I got a 
foothold on it he shouted to Jim to soar aw^ay. 
But Jim had clean lost his head, and said he had 
forgot how. So Tom shinned along up and told 
me to follow; but the lion was arriving, fetching 
a most ghastly roar with every lope, and my legs 
shook so I das n't try to take one of them out of 
the rounds for fear the other one would give way 
under me. 

But Tom was aboard by this time, and he 
started the balloon up a little, and stopped it 
again as soon as the end of the ladder was ten 
or twelve feet above ground. And there was 
the lion, a-ripping around under me, and roaring 
and springing up in the air at the ladder, and 



LAND. «I 

only missing it about a quarter of an inch, it 
seemed to me. It was delicious to be out of his 
reach, perfectly delicious, and made me feel good 
and thankful all up one side; but I was hanging 
there helpless and could n't climb, and that made 
me feel perfectly wretched and miserable all 
down the other. It is most seldom that a per- 
son feels so mixed, like that; and it is not to be 
recommended, either. 

Tom asked me what he 'd better do, but I 
did n't know. He asked me if I could hold on 
whilst he sailed away to a safe place and left the 
lion behind. I said I could if he did n't go no 
higher than he was now; but if he went higher I 
would lose my head and fall, sure. So he said, 
''Take a good grip," and he started. 

" Don't go so fast," I shouted. " It makes my 
head swim." 

He had started like a lightning express. He 
slowed down, and we glided over the sand 
slower, but still in a kind of sickening w^ay; for 
it is uncomfortable to see things sliding and 
gliding under you like that, and not a sound. 

But pretty soon there was plenty of sound, for 
the lion was catching up. His noise fetched 
others. You could see them coming on the lope 



82  

from every direction, and pretty soon there was 
a couple of dozen of them under me, jumping 
up at the ladder and snarling and snapping at 
each other; and so we went skimming along 
over the sand, and these fellers doing w^hat they 
could to help us to not forgit the occasion; and 
then some other beasts come, without an invite, 
and they started a regular riot down there. 

We see this plan was a mistake. We could n't 
ever git away from them at this gait, and I 
could n't hold on forever. So Tom took a think, 
and struck another idea. That was, to kill a lion 
with the pepper-box revolver, and then sail away 
while the others stopped to fight over the car- 
cass. So he stopped the balloon still, and done 
it, and then we sailed off while the fuss was 
going on, and come down a quarter of a mile 
off, and they helped me aboard; but by the time 
we was out of reach again, that gang was on 
hand once more. And when they see we was 
really gone and they could n't get us, they sat 
down on their hams and looked up at us so kind 
of disappointed that it was as much as a person 
could do not to see their side of the matter. 



CHAPTER VI. 

IT S A CARAVAN. 

I WAS SO weak that the only thing I wanted was 
a chance to lay down, so I made straight for my 
locker-bunk, and stretched myself out there. But 
a body could n't get back his strength in no such 
oven as that, so Tom give the command to soar, 
and Jim started her aloft. 

We had to go up a mile before we struck com- 
fortable weather where it was breezy and pleas- 
ant and just right, and pretty soon I was all 
straight again. Tom had been setting quiet and 
thinking ; but now he jumps up and says : 

'' I bet you a thousand to one / know where 
we are. We re in the Great Sahara, as sure as 
guns ! " 

He was so excited he could n't hold still ; but 
I was n't. I says : 

'* Well, then, where 's the Great Sahara ? In 
England or in Scotland?" 

''T ain't in either, it 's in Africa." 

Jim's eyes bugged out, and he begun to stare 

83 



84  

down with no end of interest, because that was 
where his originals come from ; but I did n't 
more than half believe it. I could n't, you know ; 
it seemed too awful far away for us to have trav- 
eled. 

But Tom was full of his discovery, as he called 
it, and said the lions and the sand meant the 
Great Desert, sure. He said he could 'a' found 
out, before we sighted land, that we w^as crowd- 
ing the land somewheres, if he had thought of one 
thing ; and when we asked him what, he said : 

''These clocks. They 're chronometers. You 
always read about them in sea voyages. One of 
them is keeping Grinnage time, and the other is 
keeping St. Louis time, like my watch. When 
we left St. Louis it was four in the afternoon by 
my watch and this clock, and it was ten at night 
by this Grinnage clock. Well, at this time of the 
year the sun sets about seven o'clock. Now I 
noticed the time yesterday evening when the sun 
went down, and it w^as half-past five o'clock by 
the Grinnage clock, and half-past eleven a. m. by 
my watch and the other clock. You see, the sun 
rose and set by my watch in St. Louis, and the 
Grinnage clock was six hours fast ; but we 've 
come so far east that it comes within less than 




WE SWOOPED DOWN, NOW, ALL OF A SUDDEN. 



IT 'S A CARAVAN. 8/ 

half an hour of setting by the Grinnage clock, 
now, and I 'm away out — more than four hours 
and a half out. You see, that meant that we was 
closing up on the longitude of Ireland, and would 
strike it before long if we was p'inted right — 
which we was n't. No, sir, we 've been a-wan- 
dering — wandering 'way down south of east, and 
it 's my opinion we are in Africa. Look at this 
map. You see how the shoulder of Africa sticks 
out to the west. Think how fast we 've traveled ; 
if we had gone straight east we would be long 
past England by this time. You watch for noon, 
all of you, and we '11 stand up, and when we 
can't cast a shadow we '11 find that this Grinnage 
clock is coming mighty close to marking twelve. 
Yes, sir, /think we 're in Africa ; and it 's just 
bully." 

Jim was gazing down with the glass. He 
shook his head and says : 

'* Mars Tom, I reckon dey 's a mistake som'er's. 
I hain't seen no niggers yit." 

''That 's nothing ; they don't live in the desert. 
What is that, 'way off yonder ? Gimme a glass." 

He took a long look, and said it w^as like a 
black string stretched across the sand, but he 
could n't guess what it was. 



88  

" Well," I says, " I reckon maybe you 've got a 
chance, now, to find out whereabouts this balloon 
is, because as like as not that is one of these lines 
here, that 's on the map, that you call meridians 
of longitude, and we can drop down and look at 
its number, and — " 

** Oh, shucks, Huck Finn, I never see such a 
lunkhead as you. Did you s'pose there 's merid- 
ians of longitude on the ear^A .^" 

" Tom* Sawyer, they 're set down on the map, 
and you know it perfectly well, and here they 
are, and you can see for yourself." 

" Of course they 're on the map, but that 's 
nothing ; there ain't any on the gi-oimdr 

"Tom, do you know that to be so?" 

" Certainly I do." 

** Well, then, that map 's a liar again. I never 
see such a liar as that map." 

He fired up at that, and I was ready for him, 
and Jim was warming his opinion, too, and next 
minute we 'd 'a' broke loose on another argument, 
if Tom had n't dropped the glass and begun to 
clap his hands like a maniac and sing out — 

" Camels ! — Camels ! " 

So I grabbed a glass, and Jim, too, and took a 
look, but I was disappointed, and says — 



IT 'S A CARAVAN. 89 

'' Camels your granny, they 're spiders." 
'' Spiders in a desert, you shad ? Spiders walk-, 
ing in a procession ? You don't ever reflect, Huck 
Finn, and I reckon you really have n't got anything 
to reflect with. Don't you know we Ve as much as 
a mile up in the air, and that that string of crawl- 
ers is two or three miles away ? Spiders, good 
land ! Spiders as big as a cow^ ? Perhaps you 'd 
like to go down and milk one of 'em. But they 're 
camels, just the same. It 's a caravan, that 's 
what it is, and it 's a mile long." 

''Well, then, le' 's go down and look at it. I 
don't believe in it, and ain't going to till I see it 
and know it." 

" All rig^ht," he says, and give the command : 
** Lower away." 

As we come slanting down into the hot 
weather, we could see that it was camels, sure 
enough, plodding along, an everlasting string of 
them, with bales strapped to them, and several 
hundred men in long white robes, and a thing 
Hke a shawd bound over their heads and hang- 
ing down with tassels and fringes ; and some of 
the men had long guns and some had n't, and 
some was riding and some was walking. And 
the weather — well, it was just roasting. And 



90  

how slow they did creep along ! We swooped 
down, now, all of a sudden, and stopped about 
a hundred yards over their heads. 

The men 'all set up a yell, and some of them 
fell flat on their stomachs, some beg^un to fire 
their guns at us, and the rest broke and scam- 
pered every which way, and so did the 
camels. 

We see that we was making trouble, so we 
went up again about a mile, to the cool weather, 
and watched them from there. It took them an 
hour to get together and form the procession 
again ; then they started along, but we could see 
by the glasses that they was n't paying much at- 
tention to anything but us. We poked along, 
looking down at them with the glasses, and by 
and by we see a big sand mound, and something 
like people the other side of it, and there was 
something like a man laying on top of the 
mound, that raised his head up every now and 
then, and seemed to be watching the caravan or 
us, we did n't know which. As the caravan got 
nearer, he sneaked down on the other side and 
rushed to the other men and horses — for that 
is what they was — and we see them mount in a 
hurry ; and next, here they come, like a house 




THE LAST MAN TO GO SNATCHED UP A CHILD. AND CARRIED IT OFF 
IN FRONT OF HIM ON HIS HORSE." 



IT 'S A CARAVAN. 93 

afire, some with lances and some with long guns, 
and all of them yelling the best they could. 

They come a-tearing down onto the caravan, 
and the next minute both sides crashed together 
and was all mixed up, and there was such an- 
other popping of guns as you never heard, and the 
air got so full of smoke you could only catch 
glimpses of them struggling together. There 
must 'a' been six hundred men in that battle, and 
it was terrible to see. Then they broke up into 
gangs and groups, fighting tooth and nail, and 
scurrying and scampering around, and laying 
into each other like everything ; and whenever 
the smoke cleared a little you could see dead 
and wounded people and camels scattered far 
and wide and all about, and camels racing off in 
every direction. 

At last the robbers see they could n't win, so 
their chief sounded a signal, and all that was left 
of them broke away and went scampering across 
the plain. The last man to go snatched up a 
child and carried it off in front of him on his 
horse, and a woman run screaming and begging 
after him, and followed him away off across the 
plain till she was separated a long ways from her 
people ; but it war n't no use, and she had to 



94 TOM SAWYER ABROAD, 

give it up, and we see her sink down on the sand 
and cover her face with her hands. Then Tom 
took the helium, and started for that yahoo, and 
we come a-whizzing down and made a swoop, 
and knocked him out of the saddle, child and all; 
and he was jarred considerable, but the child 
was n't hurt, but laid there working- its hands 
and legs in the air like a tumble-bug that 's on 
its back and can't turn over. The man went 
staggering off to overtake his horse, and did n't 
know what had hit him, for we was three or four 
hundred yards up in the air by this time. 

We judged the woman would go and get the 
child, now; but she did n't. We could see her, 
through the glass, still setting there, with her 
head bowed down on her knees; so of course she 
had n't seen the performance, and thought her 
child was clean gone with the man. She was 
nearly a half a mile from her people, so we thought 
we might go down to the child, which was about 
a quarter of a mile beyond her, and snake it to 
her before the caravan people could git to us to 
do us any harm ; and besides, we reckoned 
they had enough business on their hands for one 
while, anyway, with the wounded. We thought 
we 'd chance it, and we did. We swooped down 




WE COME A-WHIZZING DOWN, MADE A SWOOP, AND KNOCKED HIM OUT 
OF THE SADDLE, CHILD AND ALL." 



IT 'S A CARAVAN. 97 

and stopped, and Jim shinned down the ladder 
and fetched up the kid, which was a nice fat lit- 
tle thing, and in a noble good humor, too, consid- 
ering it was just out of a battle and been tumbled 
off of a horse; and then we started for the mother, 
and stopped back of her and tolerable near by, 
and Jim slipped down and crept up easy, and 
when he was close back of her the child goo- 
goo'd, the way a child does, and she heard it, 
and whirled and fetched a shriek of joy, and 
made a jump for the kid and snatched it and 
hugged it, and dropped it and hugged Jim, and 
then snatched off a gold chain and hung it 
around Jim's neck, and hugged him again, and 
jerked up the child again, a-sobbing and glorify- 
ing all the time ; and Jim he shoved for the lad- 
der and up it, and in a minute we was back up 
in the sky and the woman was staring up, with 
the back of her head between her shoulders and 
the child with its arms locked around her neck. 
And there she stood, as long as we was in sight 
a-sailing away in the sky. 



CHAPTER VII. 

TOM RESPECTS THE FLEA. 

** Noon ! " says Tom, and so it was. His shad- 
der was just a blot around his feet. We looked, 
and the Grinnage clock was so close to twelve 
the difference did n't amount to nothing. So 
Tom said London was right north of us or right 
south of us, one or t'other, and he reckoned by 
the weather and the sand and the camels it was 
north ; and a good many miles north, too ; as 
many as from New York to the city of Mexico, 
he guessed. 

Jim said he reckoned a balloon was a good 
deal the fastest thing in the world, unless it 
might be some kinds of birds — a wild pigeon, 
maybe, or a railroad. 

But Tom said he had read about railroads in 
England going nearly a hundred miles an hour 
for a little ways, and there never was a bird in 
the world that could do that — except one, and 

that was a flea. 

98 




"AND Where's your railroad, 'longside of a flea?" 



TOM RESPECTS THE FLEA. lOI 

"A flea? Why, Mars Tom, in de fust place he 
ain't a bird, strickly speakin' — " 

" Pie ain't a bird, eh ? Well, then, what is he ? " 

** I don't rightly know, Mars Tom, but I speck 
he 's only jist a' animal. No, I reckon dat won't 
do, nuther, he ain't big enough for a' animal. 
He mus' be a bug. Yassir, dat 's what he is, he 's 
a bug." 

'* I bet he ain't, but let it go. What 's your 
second place ? " 

" Well, in de second place, birds is creturs dat 
goes a long ways, but a flea don't." 

'' He don't, don't he ? Come, now, what zs a 
long distance, if you know ? " 

" Why, it 's miles, and lots of 'em — anybody 
knows dat." 

" Can't a man walk miles ? " 

*' Yassir, he kin." 

" As many as a railroad ?" 

" Yassir, if you give him time." 

''Can't a flea?" 

" Well, — I s'pose so — ef you gives him heaps 
of time." 

" Now you begin to see, don't you, that distance 
ain't the thing to judge by, at all; it 's the time it 
takes to go the distance in that counts, ain't it ? " 



102  

"Well, hit do look sorter so, but I would n't 
'a' b'lieved it, Mars Tom." 

'' It 's a matter oi pj^oportion, that 's what it is; 
and when you come to gauge a thing's speed by 
its size, where 's your bird and your man and 
your railroad, alongside of a flea ? The fastest 
man can't run more than about ten miles in an 
hour — not much over ten thousand times his own 
length. But all the books says any common 
ordinary third-class flea can jump a hundred and 
fifty times his own length; yes, and he can make 
five jumps a second too, — seven hundred and 
fifty times his own length, in one little second — 
for he don't fool away any time stopping and 
starting — he does them both at the same time; 
you '11 see, if you try to put your finger on him. 
Now that 's a common, ordinary, third-class flea's 
gait; but you take an Eyetalianyfri-/-class, that 's 
been the pet of the nobility all his life, and has n't 
ever knowed what want or sickness or exposure 
was, and he can jump more than three hundred 
times his own length, and keep it up all day, 
five such jumps every second, which is fifteen 
hundred times his own length. Well, suppose a 
man could go fifteen hundred times his own 
length in a second — say, a mile and a half. It 's 



TOM RESPECTS THE FLEA. 103 

ninety miles a minute; it 's considerable more 
than five thousand miles an hour. Where 's 
your man nozu .^— yes, and your bird, and your 
railroad, and your balloon ? Laws, they don't 
amount to shucks 'longside of a flea. A flea is 
just a comet b'iled down small." 

Jim was a good deal astonished, and so was I. 
Jim said — 

" Is dem figgers jist edjackly true, en no jokin' 
en no lies, Mars Tom ? " 

''Yes, they are; they 're perfectly true." 

" Well, den, honey, a body 's got to respec' a 
flea. I ain't had no respec' for um befo', sca'sely, 
but dey ain't no gittin' roun' it, dey do deserve 
it, dat 's certain." 

"Well, I bet they do. They 've got ever so 
much more sense, and brains, and brightness, in 
proportion to their size, than any other cretur in 
the world. A person can learn them 'most any- 
thing; and they learn it quicker than any other 
cretur, too. They 've been learnt to haul little 
carriages in harness, and go this way and that 
way and t' other way according to their orders; 
yes, and to march and drill like soldiers, doing 
it as exact, according to orders, as soldiers does 
it. They 've been learnt to do all sorts of hard 



104  

and troublesome thing's. S'pose you could culti- 
vate a flea up to the size of a man, and keep his 
natural smartness a-growing and a-growing right 
along up, bigger and bigger, and keener and 
keener, in the same proportion — where 'd the 
human race be, do you reckon ? That flea would 
be President of the United States, and you 
could n't any more prevent it than you can pre- 
vent lightning." 

*' My Ian', Mars Tom, I never knowed dey was 
so much to de beas'. No, sir, I never had no 
idea of it, and dat 's de fac'." 

''There 's more to him, by a long sight, than 
there is to any other cretur, man or beast, in pro- 
portion to size. He's the interestingest of them 
all. People have so much to say about an ant's 
strength, and an elephant's, and a locomotive's. 
Shucks, they don't begin with a flea. He can 
lift two or three hundred times his own weight. 
And none of them can come anywhere near it. 
And moreover, he has got notions of his ow n, 
and is very particular, and you can't fool him; 
his instinct, or his judgment, or whatever it is, is 
perfectly sound and clear, and don't ever make a 
mistake. People think all humans are alike to a 
flea. It ain't so. There 's folks that he won't go 



TOM RESPECTS THE FLEA. 105 

near, hungry or not hungry, and I 'm one of 
them. I 've never had one of them on me in my 
hfe." 

^'Mars Tom!" 

" It 's so ; I ain't joking-." 

** Well, sah, I hain't ever heard de likes o' dat, 
befo'." 

Jim could n't believe it, and I could n't ; so 
we had to drop down to the sand and git a sup- 
ply and see. Tom was right They went for 
me and Jim by the thousand, but not a one of 
them lit on Tom. There war n't no explaining 
it, but there it was and there war n't no getting 
around it. He said it had always been just so, 
and he 'd just as soon be where there was a mil- 
lion of them as not ; they 'd never touch him 
nor bother him. 

We went up to the cold weather to freeze 'em 
out, and stayed a little spell, and then come 
back to the comfortable weather and went lazy- 
ing along twenty or twenty-five miles an hour, 
the way we 'd been doing for the last few^ hours. 
The reason was, that the longer we was in that 
solemn, peaceful desert, the more the hurry and 
fuss got kind of soothed down in us, and the 
more happier and contented and satisfied we 



lo6  

g-ot to feeling, and the more we got to liking 
the desert, and then loving it. So we had 
cramped the speed down, as I was saying, and 
was having a most noble good lazy time, some- 
times watching through the glasses, sometimes 
stretched out on the lockers reading, sometimes 
taking a nap. 

It did n't seem like we was the same lot that 
was in such a state to find land and git ashore, 
but it was. But we had got over that — clean 
over it. We was used to the balloon, now, and 
not afraid any more, and did n't want to be any- 
wheres else. Why, it seemed just like home ; it 
'most seemed as if I had been born and raised 
in it, and Jim and Tom said the same. And 
always I had had hateful people around me, 
a-nagging at me, and pestering of me, and scold- 
ing, and finding fault, and fussing and bother- 
ing, and sticking to me, and keeping after me. 
and making me do this, and making me do that 
and t'other, and always selecting out the things 
I did n't want to do, and then giving me Sam 
Hill because I shirked and done something else, 
and just aggravating the life out of a body all 
the time ; but up here in the sky it was so still 
and sunshiny and lovely, and plenty to eat, and 



TOM RESPECTS THE FLEA. 109 

plenty of sleep, and strange things to see, and 
no nagging and no pestering, and no good peo- 
ple, and just holiday all the time. Land, I 
war n't in no hurry to git out and buck at civil- 
ization again. Now, one of the worst things 
about civilization is, that anybody that gits a 
letter with trouble in it comes and tells you all 
about it and makes you feel bad, and the news- 
papers fetches you the troubles of everybody all 
over the world, and keeps you down-hearted 
and dismal 'most all the time, and it 's such a 
heavy load for a person. I hate them news- 
papers ; and I hate letters ; and if I had my 
way I would n't allow nobody to load his 
troubles onto other folks he ain't acquainted 
with, on t'other side of the world, that way. 
Well, up in a balloon there ain't any of that, 
and it 's the darlingest place there is. 

We had supper, and that night was one of the 
prettiest nights I ever see. The moon made it 
just like daylight, only a heap softer ; and once 
we see a lion standing all alone by himself, just 
all alone on the earth, it seemed like, and his 
shadder laid on the sand by him like a puddle 
of ink. That 's the kind of moonlight to have. 

Mainly we laid on our backs and talked ; we 



no  

did n't want to go to sleep. Tom said we was 
right in the midst of the Arabian Nights, now. 
He said it was right along here that one of the 
cutest things in that book happened ; so we 
looked down and watched while he told about 
it, because there ain't anything that is so inter- 
esting to look at as a place that a book has 
talked about. It was a tale about a camel-driver 
that had lost his camel, and he come along in 
the desert and met a man, and says — 

''Have you run across a stray camel to-day ?" 

And the man says — 

'' Was he blind in his left eye ? " 

''Yes." 

" Had he lost an upper front tooth ? " 

"Yes." 

" Was his off hind leg lame ? " 

"Yes." 

" Was he loaded with millet-seed on one side 
and honey on the other ? " 

" Yes, but you need n't go into no more de- 
tails — that 's the one, and I 'm in a hurry. 
Where did you see him ? " 

" I hain't seen him at all," the man says. 

" Hain't seen him at all ? How can you de- 
scribe him so close, then ?" 



TOM RESPECTS THE FLEA. I13 

''Because when a person knows how to use 
his eyes, everything has got a meaning to it ; 
but most people's eyes ain't any good to them. 
I knowed a camel had been along, because I 
seen his track. I knowed he was lame in his off 
hind leg because he had favored that foot and 
trod light on it, and his track showed it. I 
knowed he was blind on his left side because he 
only nibbled the grass on the right side of the 
trail. I knowed he had lost an upper front 
tooth because where he bit into the sod his teeth- 
print showed it. The millet-seed sifted out on 
one side — the ants told me that ; the honey 
leaked out on the other — the flies told me that. 
I know all about your camel, but I hain't seen 
him." 

Jim says — 

''Go on. Mars Tom, hit 's a mighty good tale, 
and powerful interestin'." 

"That 's all," Tom says. 

''All?'' says Jim, astonished. "What 'come 
o' de camel ?" 

"I don't know." 

" Mars Tom, don't de tale say ? " 

" No." 

Jim puzzled a minute, then he says — 



114 TOM SAWYER A15ROAD. 

"Well ! Ef dat ain't de beatenes' tale ever / 
struck. Jist gits to de place whah de intrust is 
gittin' red-hot, en down she breaks. Why, Mars 
Tom, dey ain't no sense in a tale dat acts like 
dat. Hain't you got no idea whether de man 
got de camel back er not ?" 

'*No, I have n't." 

I see, myself, there war n't no sense in the 
tale, to chop square off, that way, before it come 
to anything, but I war n't going to say so, be- 
cause I could see Tom was souring up pretty 
fast over the way it flatted out and the way Jim 
had popped onto the weak place in it, and I 
don't think it 's fair for everybody to pile onto a 
feller when he 's down. But Tom he whirls on 
me and says — 

'' What Ao yo2L think of the tale?" 

Of course, then, I had to come out and make a 
clean breast and say it did seem to me, too, same 
as it did to Jim, that as long as the tale stopped 
square in the middle and never got to no place, 
it really war n't worth the trouble of telling. 

Tom's chin dropped on his breast, and 'stead 
of being mad, as I reckoned he 'd be, to hear me 
scoff at his tale that way, he seemed to be only 
sad ; and he says — 



TOM RESPECTS THE FLEA. II5 

" Some people can see, and some can't — just as 
that man said. Let alone a camel, if a cyclone 
had gone by, you duffers would n't 'a' noticed 
the track." 

I don't know what he meant by that, and he 
did n't say ; it was just one of his irrulevances, I 
reckon — he was full of them, sometimes, when 
he was in a close place and could n't see no 
other way out — but I did n't mind. We 'd 
spotted the soft place in that tale sharp enough, 
he could n't git away from that little fact. It 
graveled him like the nation, too, I reckon, 
much as he tried not to let on. 



CHAPTER VIII. 

THE DISAPPEARING LAKE. 

We had an early breakfast in the morning, 
and set looking down on the desert, and the 
weather was ever so bammy and lovely, al- 
though we war n't high up. You have to come 
down lower and lower after sundown, in the 
desert, because it cools off so fast ; and so, by 
the time it is getting towards dawn you are 
skimming along only a little ways above the 
sand. 

We was watching the shadder of the balloon 
slide along the ground, and now and then gaz- 
ing off across the desert to see if anything was 
stirring, and then down at the shadder again, 
when all of a sudden almost right under us we 
see a lot of men and camels laying scattered 
about, perfectly quiet, like they was asleep. 

We shut off the power, and backed up and 
stood over them, and then we see that they was 
all dead. It give us the cold shivers. And it 
made us hush down, too, and talk low, like peo- 
ple at a funeral. We dropped down slow, and 

Ii6 



THE DISAPPEARING LAKE, II7 

stopped, and me and Tom clumb down and 
went amongst them. There was men, and 
women, and children. They was dried by the 
sun and dark and shriveled and leathery, like 
the pictures of mummies you see in books. And 
yet they looked just as human, you would n't a' 
believed it ; just like they was asleep. 

Some of the people and animals was partly 
covered with sand, but most of them not, for 
the sand was thin there, and the bed was gravel, 
and hard. Most of the clothes had rotted away ; 
and when you took hold of a rag, it tore with a 
touch, like spider-web. Tom reckoned they had 
been laying there for years. 

Some of the men had rusty guns by them, 
some had swords on and had shawl belts with 
long silver-mounted pistols stuck in them. All 
the camels had their loads on, yet, but the packs 
had busted or rotted and spilt the freight out 
on the ground. We did n't reckon the swords 
was any good to the dead people any more, so 
we took one apiece, and some pistols. We took 
a small box, too, because it was so handsome 
and inlaid so fine ; and then we wanted to bury 
the people ; but there war n't no way to do it 
that we could think of, and nothing to do it 



Il8  

with but sand, and that would blow away again, 
of course. 

Then we mounted high and sailed away, and 
pretty soon that black spot on the sand was out 
of sight and we would n't ever see them poor 
people again in this world. We wondered, and 
reasoned, and tried to guess how they come to 
be there, and how it all happened to them, but 
we could n't make it out. First we thought 
maybe they got lost, and wandered around and 
about till their food and water give out and they 
starved to death ; but Tom said no wild animals 
nor vultures had n't meddled with them, and so 
that guess would n't do. So at last we give it 
up, and judged we would n't think about it no 
more, because it made us low-spirited. 

Then we opened the box, and it had gems and 
jewels in it, quite a pile, and some little veils of 
the kind the dead women had on, with fringes 
made out of curious ofold monev that we war n't 
acquainted with. We wondered if we better go 
and try to find them again and give it back ; but 
Tom thought it over and said no, it was a coun- 
try that was full of robbers, and they would 
come and steal it, and then the sin would be on 
us for putting the temptation in their way. So 



^^v^ 




THE DISAPPEARING LAKE. 121 

we went on ; but I wished we had took all they 
had, so there would n't 'a' been no temptation at 
all left. 

We had had two hours of that blazing weather 
down there, and was dreadful thirsty when we 
got aboard again. We went straight for the 
water, but it was spoiled and bitter, besides be- 
ing pretty near hot enough to scald your mouth. 
We could n't drink it. It was Mississippi river 
water, the best in the world, and we stirred up 
the mud in it to see if that would help, but no, 
the mud was n't any better than the water. 

Well, we had n't been so very, very thirsty 
before, whilst we was interested in the lost peo- 
ple, but we was, now, and as soon as we found 
we could n't have a drink, we wa^ more than 
thirty-five timics as thirsty as we was a quarter 
of a minute before. Why, in a little while we 
wanted to hold our mouths open and pant like 
a dog. 

Tom said to keep a sharp lookout, all around, 
everywheres, because we 'd got to find an oasis 
or there war n't no telling what would happen. 
So we done it. We kept the glasses gliding 
around all the time, till our arms got so tired we 
could n't hold them any more. Two hours — 



122  

three hours — just gazing and gazing, and noth- 
ing but sand, sand, sand, and you could see the 
quivering heat-shimmer playing over it. Dear, 
dear, a body don't know what real misery is till 
he is thirsty all the w^ay through and is certain 
he ain't ever going to come to any water any 
more. At last I could n't stand it to look around 
on them baking plains ; I laid down on the 
locker, and give it up. 

But by and by Tom raised a whoop, and there 
she was ! A lake, wide and shiny, with pam- 
trees leaning over it asleep, and their shadders 
in the water just as soft and delicate as ever you 
see. I never see anything look so good. It was 
a long ways off, but that war n't anything to us ; 
we just slapped on a hundred-mile gait, and cal- 
culated to be there in seven minutes ; but she 
stayed the same old distance away, all the time ; 
we could n't seem to gain on her ; yes, sir, just 
as far, and shiny, and like a dream ; but we 
could n't get no nearer ; and at last, all of a sud- 
den, she was gone ! 

Tom's eyes took a spread, and he says — 
" Boys, it was a myridge ! " Said it like he was 
glad. I did n't see nothing to be glad about. I 
says — 



THE DISAPPEARING LAKE. 123 

** May be. I don't care nothing about its 
name, the thing I want to know is, what 's be- 
come of it ? " 

Jim was trembhng all over, and so scared he 
could n't speak, but he wanted to ask that ques- 
tion himself if he could 'a' done it. Tom says — 

'' What 's become of it ? Why, you see, your- 
self, it 's gone." 

''Yes, I know ; but where 's it gone tof 

He looked me over and says — 

''Well, now% Huck Finn, where would \i goto? 
Don't you know what a myridge is ? " 

" No, I don't. What is it ? " 

"Jt ain't anything but imagination. There 
ain't anything to it." 

It warmed me up a little to hear him talk like 
that, and I says — 

" What 's the use you talking that kind of 
stuff, Tom Sawyer ? Did n't I see the lake ?" 

" Yes — you think you did." 

" I don't think nothing about it, I did see it." 

" I tell you you did nt see it either — because it 
war n't there to see." 

It astonished Jim to hear him talk so, and he 
broke in and says, kind of pleading and dis- 
tressed — 



124  

" Mars Tom, please don't say sich things in 
sich an awful time as dis. You ain't only reskin' 
yo' own self, but you 's reskin' us — same way 
like Anna Nias en' Siffira. De lake wmz dah — I 
seen it jis' as plain as I sees you en Huck dis 
minute." 

I says — 

"Why, he seen it himself! He was the very 
one that seen it first. Now, then ! " 

'' Yes, Mars Tom, hit 's so — you can't deny 
it. We all seen it, en AdA. prove \i was dah." 

'* Proves it ! Hozv does it prove it ? " 

" Same way it does in de courts en every- 
wheres, Mars Tom. One pusson might be 
drunk, or dreamy or suthin', en he could be mis- 
taken ; en two might, maybe ; but I tell you, 
sah, when three sees a thing, drunk cr sober, 
it 's so. Dey ain't no gittin' aroun' dat, en you 
knows it, Mars Tom." 

" I don't know nothing of the kind. There 
used to be forty thousand million people that 
seen the sun move from one side of the sky to 
the other every day. Did that prove that the 
sun done it ? " 

'* 'Course it did. En besides, dey war n't no 
'casion to prove it. A body 'at 's got any sense 



THE DISAPPEARING LAKE. 125 

ain't g-wine to doubt it. Dah she is, now — a 
sailin' thoo de sky, like she allays done." 

Tom turned on me, then, and says — 

'' What do you say — is the sun standing still ? " 

" Tom Sawyer, what 's the use to ask such a 
jackass question ? Anybody that ain't blind can 
see it don't stand still." 

" Well," he says, ''I 'm lost in the sky with no 
company but a passel of low-down animals that 
don't know no more than the head boss of a 
university did three or four hundred years ago." 

It war n't fair play, and I let him know it. I 
says — 

^'Throwin' mud ain't arguin', Tom Sawyer." 

'' Oh, my goodness, oh, my goodness gracious, 
dah 's de lake ag'in ! " yelled Jim, just then. 
''Now, Mars Tom, what you gwine to say ? " 

Yes, sir, there was the lake again, away yon- 
der across the desert, perfectly plain, trees and 
all, just the same as it was before. I says — 

'' I reckon you 're satisfied now, Tom Sawyer." 

But he says, perfectly ca'm — 

" Yes, satisfied there ain't no lake there." 

Jim says — 

'* Dont talk so. Mars Tom — it sk'yers me to 
hear you. It 's so hot, en you 's so thirsty, dat 



126  

you ain't in yo' right mine, Mars Tom. Oh, 
but don't she look good ! 'clah I doan' know 
how I 's gwine to wait tell we gits dah, I 's so 
thirsty." 

'' Well, you '11 have to wait ; and it won't do 
you no good, either, because there ain't no lake 
there, I tell you." 

I says — 

**Jim, don't you take your eye off of it, and 
I won't, either." 

"'Deed I won't; en bless you, honey, I 
could n't ef I wanted to." 

We went a-tearing along toward it, piling the 
miles behind us like nothing, but never gaining 
an inch on it — and all of a sudden it was gone 
again ! Jim staggered, and 'most fell down. 
When he got his breath he says, gasping like a 
fish— 

''Mars Tom, hit 's 2^ ghos\ dat 's what it is, en 
I hopes to goodness we ain't gwine to see it no 
mo'. Dey 's been a lake, en suthin 's happened, 
en de lake 's dead, en we 's seen its ghos'; we 's 
seen it twiste, en dat 's proof. De desert 's 
ha'nted, it 's ha'nted, sho'; oh, Mars Tom, le's git 
outen it; I 'd ruther die den have de night ketch 
us in it ag'in en de ghos' er dat lake come 



THE DISAPPEARING LAKE. 12/ 

a-mournin' aroun' us en we asleep en doan' know 
de danger we 's in." 

'* Ghost, you gander ! It ain't anything but 
air and heat and thirstiness pasted together by a 
person's imagination. If I — gimme the glass!" 

He grabbed it and begun to gaze off to the 
right. 

'* It 's a flock of birds," he says. '* It 's getting 
toward sundown, and they 're making a bee-line 
across our track for somewheres. They mean 
business — maybe they 're going for food or 
water, or both. Let her go to starboard ! — Port 
your helium ! Hard down ! There — ease up — 
steady, as you go." 

We shut dowm some of the power, so as not to 
outspeed them, and took out after them. We 
went skimming along a quarter of a mile behind 
them, and when we had follow^ed them an hour 
and a half and was getting pretty discouraged, 
and w^as thirsty clean to unendurableness, Tom 
says — 

''Take the glass, one of you, and see what that 
is, away ahead of the birds." 

Jim got the first glimpse, and slumped down 
on the locker, sick. He was most crying, and 
says — 



128  

" She 's dah agi'n, Mars Tom, she 's dah ag'in, 
en I knows I 's gwine to die, 'case when a body 
sees a ghos' de third time, dat 's what it means. 
I wisht I 'd never come in dis balloon, dat I 
does." 

He would n't look no more, and what he said 
made me afraid, too, because I knowed it was 
true, for that has always been the way with 
ghosts; so then I would n't look any more, 
either. Both of us begged Tom to turn off and 
go some other way, but he would n't, and said 
we was ignorant superstitious blatherskites. Yes, 
and he '11 git come up with, one of these days, I 
says to myself, insulting ghosts that way. 
They '11 stand it for a while, maybe, but they 
won't stand it always, for anybody that knows 
about ghosts knows how easy they are hurt, and 
how revengeful they are. 

So we was all quiet and still, Jim and me be- 
ing scared, and Tom busy. By and by Tom 
fetched the balloon to a standstill, and says — 

'' Nozu get up and look, you sapheads." 

We done it, and there was the sure-enough 
water right under us ! — clear, and bine, and cool, 
and deep, and w^avy with the breeze, the loveli- 
est sight that ever was. And all about it was 



THE DISAPPEARING LAKE. 129 

grassy banks, and flowers, and shady groves of 
big trees, looped together with vines, and all 
looking so peaceful and comfortable, enough to 
make a body cry, it was so beautiful. 

Jim did cry, and rip and dance and carry on, 
he was so thankful and out of his mind for joy. 
It was my watch, so I had to stay by the works, 
but Tom and Jim dumb down and drunk a bar- 
rel apiece, and fetched me up a lot, and I 've 
tasted a many a good thing in my life, but noth- 
ing that ever begun with that water. 

Then we went down and had a swim, and then 
Tom came up and spelled me, and me and Jim 
had a swim, and then Jim spelled Tom, and me 
and Tom had a foot-race and a boxing-mill, and 
I don't reckon I ever had such a good time in 
my life. It w^ar n't so very hot, because it w^as 
close on to evening, and we had n't any clothes 
on, anyway. Clothes is w-ell enough in school, 
and in towns, and at balls, too, but there ain't no 
sense in them when there ain't no civilization 
nor other kinds of bothers and fussiness around. 

" Lions a-comin' ! — lions ! Quick, Mars Tom, 
jump for yo' life, Huck ! " 

Oh, and did n't we ! We never stopped for 
clothes, but waltzed up the ladder just so. Jim 



130  

lost his head straight off — he always done it 
whenever he got excited and scared ; and so 
now, 'stead of just easing the ladder up from the 
ground a little, so the animals could n't reach it, 
he turned on a raft of power, and we went whiz- 
zing up and was dangling in the sky before he 
got his wits together and seen what a foolish 
thing he was doing. Then he stopped her, but 
he had clean forgot what to do next ; so there 
we was, so high that the lions looked like pups, 
and we was drifting off on the wind. 

But Tom he shinned up and went for the 
works and begun to slant her down, and back 
towards the lake, where the animals was gather- 
ing like a camp-meeting, and I judged he had 
lost his head, too ; for he knowed I was too 
scared to climb, and did he want to dump me 
among the tigers and things ? 

But no, his head was level, he knowed what 
he was about. He swooped down to within 
thirty or forty feet of the lake, and stopped right 
over the centre, and sung out — 

*' Leggo, and drop ! " 

I done it, and shot down, feet first, and 
seemed to go about a mile toward the bottom ; 
and when I come up, he says — 




AND ALL THIS TIME THE LIONS AND TIGERS WAS SORTING OUT THE CLOTHES. 



THE DISAPPEARING LAKE. 133 

" Now lay on your back and float till you 're 
rested and got your pluck back, then I '11 dip the 
ladder in the water and you can climb aboard." 

I done it. Now that was ever so smart in 
Tom, because if he had started off somewheres 
else to drop down on the sand, the menagerie 
would 'a' come along, too, and might a' kept us 
hunting a safe place till I got tuckered out and fell. 

And all this time the lions and tigers was sort- 
ing out the clothes, and trying to divide them 
up so there would be some for all, but there was 
a misunderstanding about it somewheres, on ac- 
counts of some of them trying to hog more than 
theit share ; so there was another insurrection, 
and you never see anything like it in the world. 
There must 'a' been fifty of them, all mixed up 
together, snorting and roaring and snapping and 
biting and tearing, legs and tails in the air and 
you could n't tell which was which, and the sand 
and fur a-flying. And when they got done, 
some was dead, and some was limping off crip- 
pled, and the rest was setting around on the bat- 
tle-field, some of them licking their sore places 
and the others looking up at us and seemed to 
be kind of inviting us to come down and have 
some fun, but which we did n't want any. 



134  

As for the clothes, they war n't any, any more. 
Every last rag of them was inside of the ani- 
mals ; and not agreeing with them very well, I 
don't reckon, for there was considerable many 
brass buttons on them, and there was knives in 
the pockets, too, and smoking-tobacco, and nails 
and chalk and marbles and fish-hooks and 
things. But I was n't caring. All that was 
bothering me was, that all we had, now, was the 
professor's clothes, a big enough assortment, but 
not suitable to go into com.pany with, if we 
came across any, because the britches was as 
long as tunnels, and the coats and things accord- 
ing. Still, there was everything a tailor needed, 
and Jim was a kind of jack-legged tailor, and he 
allowed he could soon trim a suit or two down 
for us that would answer. 



CHAPTER IX. 

TOM DISCOURSES ON THE DESERT. 

Still, we thought we would drop down there 
a minute, but on another errand. Most of the 
professor's cargo of food was put up in cans, in 
the new way that somebody had just invented, 
the rest was fresh. When you fetch Missouri 
beefsteak to the Great Sahara, you want to be 
particular and stay up in the coolish weather. 
So'we reckoned we would drop down into the 
lion market and see how we could make out 
there. 

We hauled in the ladder and dropped down 
till we was just above the reach of the animals, 
then we let down a rope with a slip-knot in it 
and hauled up a dead lion, a small tender one, 
then yanked up a cub tiger. We had to keep 
the congregation off with the revolver, or they 
would a' took a hand in the proceedings and 
helped. 

We carved off a supply from both, and saved 

135 



136  

the skins, and hove the rest overboard. Then 
we baited some of the professor's hooks with the 
fresh meat and went a-fishing. We stood over 
the lake just a convenient distance above the 
water, and catched a lot of the nicest fish you 
ever see. It was a most amazing good supper 
we had ; lion steak, tiger steak, fried fish and hot 
corn pone. I don't want nothing better than 
that. 

We had some fruit to finish off with. We got 
it out of the top of a monstrous tall tree. It was 
a very slim tree that had n't a branch on it from 
the bottom plumb to the top, and there it busted 
out like a feather-duster. It was a pam tree, of 
course ; anybody knows a pam tree the minute 
he see it, by the pictures. We went for coconuts 
in this one, but there war n't none. There was 
only big loose bunches of things like over-sized 
grapes, and Tom allowed they was dates, be- 
cause he said they answered the description in 
the Arabian Nights and the other books. Of 
course they might n't be, and they might be 
pison ; so we had to wait a spell, and watch and 
see if the birds et them. They done it ; so we 
done it too, and they was most amazing good. 

By this time monstrous big birds begun to 



TOM DISCOURSES ON THE DESERT. 137 

come and settle on the dead animals. They was 
plucky creturs ; they would tackle one end of a 
lion that was being gnaw^ed at the other end by 
another lion. If the lion drove the bird away, 
it did n't do no good, he was back again the 
minute the lion was busy. 

The big birds come out of every part of the 
sky — you could make them out with the glass 
whilst they was still so far away you could n't 
see them with your naked eye. Tom said the 
birds did n't find out the meat was there by the 
smell, they had to find it out by seeing it. Oh, 
but ain't that an eye for you ! Tom said at the 
distance of five mile a patch of dead lions 
could n't look any bigger than a person's finger 
nail, and he could n't imagine how the birds 
could notice such a little thing so far off. 

It was strange and unnatural to see lion eat 
lion, and we thought maybe they war n't kin. 
But Jim said that did n't make no difference. 
He said a hog was fond of her own children, and 
so was a spider, and he reckoned maybe a lion 
was pretty near as unprincipled though maybe 
not quite. He thought likely a lion would n't eat 
his own father, if he knowed which was him, but 
reckoned he would eat his brother-in-law if he 



138  

was uncommon hungry, and eat his mother-in- 
law any time. But reckoning don't settle noth- 
ing. You can reckon till the cows come home, 
but that don't fetch you to no decision. So we 
give it up and let it drop. 

Generly it was very still in the Desert, nights, 
but this time there was music. A lot of other 
animals come to dinner ; sneaking yelpers that 
Tom allowed was jackals, and roached-backed 
ones that he said was hyenas ; and all the whole 
biling of them kept up a racket all the time. 
They made a picture in the moonlight that was 
more different than any picture I ever see. We 
had a line out and made fast to the top of a tree, 
and did n't stand no watch, but all turned in and 
slept, but I was up two or three times to look 
dowm at the animals and hear the music. It was 
like having a front seat at a menagerie for noth- 
ing, which I had n't ever had before, and so it 
seemed foolish to sleep and not make the most 
of it, I might n't ever have such a chance again. 

We went a-fishing again in the early dawn, 
and then lazied around all day in the deep shade 
on an island, taking turn about to watch and 
see that none of the animals come a-snooping 
around there after erronorts for dinner. We 



TOM DISCOURSES ON THE DESERT. 139 

was going to leave the next day, but could n't, 
it was too lovely. 

The day after, when we rose up toward the 
sky and sailed off eastward, we looked back and 
watched that place till it war n't nothing but just 
a speck in the Desert, and I tell you it was like 
saying good-by to a friend that you ain't ever 
going to see any more. 

Jim was thinking to himself, and at last he 
says — 

" Mars Tom, we 's mos' to de end er de 
Desert now, I speck." 

''Why?" 

'* Well, hit Stan' to reason we is. You knows 
how long we 's been a-skimmin' over it. Mus' 
be mos' out o' san'. Hit 's a wonder to me dat 
it 's hilt out as long as it has." 

'' Shucks, there 's plenty sand, you need n't 
worry." 

" Oh, I ain't a-worryin', Mars Tom, only won- 
derin', dat 's all. De Lord 's got plenty san' I 
ain't doubtin' dat, but nemmine. He ain' gwyne 
to was'e it jist on dat account ; en I allows dat 
dis Desert 's plenty big enough now, jist de way 
she is, en you can't spread her out no mo' 'dout 
was'in san'." 



140  

'* Oh, go 'long" ! we ain't much more than fair- 
ly started across this Desert yet. The United 
States is a pretty big country, ain't it ? Ain't it, 
Buck ? " 

*' Yes," I says '' there ain't no bigger one, I 
don't reckon." 

''Well," he says, ''this Desert is about the 
shape of the United States, and if you was to 
lay it down on top of the United States, it w^ould 
cover the land of the free out of sight like a 
blanket. There 'd be a little corner sticking out, 
up at Maine and away up northwest, and Florida 
sticking out like a turtle's tail, and that 's all. 
We 've took California away from the Mexicans 
two or three years ago, so that part of the Pacific 
coast is ours, now, and if you laid the Great 
Sahara down with her edge on the Pacific, she 
would cover the United States and stick out pasi 
New York six hundred miles into the Atlantic 
Ocean." 

I says — 

" Good land ! have you got the documents for 
that, Tom Sawyer ? " 

"Yes, and they 're right here, and I 've been 
studying them. You can look for yourself. 
From New York to the Pacific is 2,600 miles. 



TOM DISCOURSES ON THE DESERT. 14I 

From one end of the Great Desert to the other 
is 3,200. The United States contains 3,600,000 
square miles, the Desert contains 4,162,000. 
With the Desert's bulk you could cover up every 
last inch of the United States, and in under 
where the edges projected out, you could tuck 
England, Scotland, Ireland, France, Denmark, and 
all Germany. Yes, sir, you could hide the home 
of the brave and all of them countries clean out 
of sight under the Great Sahara, and you would 
still have 2,000 square miles of sand left." 

''Well," I says, "it clean beats me. Why, 
Tom, it shows that the Lord took as much pains 
makin' this Desert as makin' the United States 
and all them other countries." 

Jim says—'' Huck, dat don' stan' to reason. I 
reckon dis Desert wa' n't made, at all. Now you 
take en look at it like dis — you look at it, and 
see ef I 's right. What 's a desert good for? 
'T ain't good for nuthin'. Dey ain't no way to 
make it pay. Hain't dat so, Huck ?" 

'* Yes, I reckon." 

'' Hain't it so, Mars Tom ?" 

*'I guess so. Go on." 

'' Ef a thing ain't no good, it 's made in vain, 
ain't it?" 



142  

*^ Yes." 

''Now, den! Do de Lord make anything in 
vain ? You answer me dat." 

- Well— no, He don't." 

" Den how come He make a desert ? " 

"■ Well, go on. How did He come to make 
it?" 

'' Mars Tom, /b'lieve it uz jes like when you 's 
buildin' a house ; dey 's allays a lot o' truck en 
rubbish lef over. What does you do wid it ? 
Doan' you take en k'yart it off en dump it into 
a ole vacant back lot ? 'Course. Now, den, it 's 
my opinion hit was jes like dat — dat de Great 
Sahara war n't made at all, she jes happen !' 

I said it was a real good argument, and I be- 
lieved it was the best one Jim ever made. Tom 
he said the same, but said the trouble about 
arguments is, they ain't nothing but theoiHeSy 
after all, and theories don't prove nothing, they 
only give you a place to rest on, a spell, when 
you are tuckered out butting around and around 
trying to find out something there ain't no way 
to find out. And he says — 

"There 's another trouble about theories: 
there 's always a hole in them somewheres, sure, 
if you look close enough. It 's just so with this 



TOM DISCOURSES ON THE DESERT. 143 

one of Jim's. Look what billions and billions of 
stars there is. How does it come that there was 
just exactly enough star-stufF, and none left 
over ? How does it come there ain't no sand- 
pile up there ? " 

But Jim was fixed for him and savs — 

'' What 's de Milky Way ? — dat 's what / wants 
to know. What 's de Milky Way ? Answer 
me dat ! " 

In my opinion it was just a sockdologer. It 's 
only an opinion, it 's only my opinion and others 
may think different ; but I said it then and I 
stand to it now — it was a sockdologer. And 
moreover, besides, it landed Tom Sawyer. He 
could n't say a word. He had that stunned look 
of a person that 's been shot in the back with a 
kag- of nails. All he said was, as for people like 
me and Jim, he 'd just as soon have intellectual 
intercourse with a catfish. But anybody can say 
that — and I notice they always do, when some- 
body has fetched them a lifter. Tom Sawyer 
was tired of that end of the subject. 

So we got back to talking about the size of 
the Desert again, and the more we compared it 
with this and that and t' other thing, the more 
nobler and bigger and grander it got to look, 



144  

right along". And so, hunting amongst the Ag- 
gers, Tom found, by and by, that it was just 
the same size as the Empire of China. Then he 
showed us the spread the Empire of China made 
on the map, and the room she took up in the 
world. Well, it was wonderful to think of, and 
I says — 

" Why, I Ve heard talk about this Desert plenty 
of times, but / never knowed, before, how im- 
portant she was." 

Then Tom says — 

*' Important ! Sahara important ! That 's just 
the way with some people. If a thing 's big, 
it 's important. That 's all the sense they 've 
got. All they can see is size. Why, look at 
England. It 's the most important country in 
the world ; and yet you could put it in China's 
vest pocket ; and not only that, but you 'd have 
the dickens's own time to find it again the next 
time you wanted it. And look at Russia. It 
spreads all around and everywhere, and yet ain't 
no more important in this world than Rhode 
Island is, and has n't got half as much in it 
that 's w^orth saving." 

Away off, now, we see a little hill, a-standing 
up just on the edge of the world. Tom broke 



TOM DISCOURSES ON THE DESERT. I45 

off his talk, and reached for a glass very much 
excited, and took a look, and says — 

''That 's it — it 's the one I ve been looking 
for, sure. If I 'm right, it 's the one the Dervish 
took the man into and showed him all the treas- 
ures." 

So we begun to gaze, and he begun to tell 
about it out of the Arabian Nights. 



CHAPTER X. 

THE TREASURE-HILL. 

Tom said it happened like this. 

A dervish was stumping it along through the 
desert, on foot, one blazing hot day, and he had 
come a thousand miles and was pretty poor, and 
hungry, and ornery and tired, and along about 
where we are now, he run across a camel driver 
with a hundred camels, and asked him for some 
ams. But the camel driver he asked to be ex- 
cused. The dervish says — 

" Don't you own these camels ? " 

'* Yes, thev 're mine." 

** Are you in debt ?" 

''Who— me? No." 

''Well, a man that owns a hundred camels and 
ain't in debt, is rich — and not only rich, but very 
rich. Ain't it so ? " 

The camel driver owned up that it was so. 
Then the dervish says — 

" God has made you rich, and He has made me 

poor. He has His reasons, and they are wise, 

blessed be His name. But He has willed that 

146 



THE TREASURE-HILL. 147 

His rich shall help His poor, and you have turned 
away from me, your brother, in my need, and He 
will remember this, and you will lose by it." 

That made the camel driver feel shaky, but all 
the same he was born hoggish after money and 
did n't like to let go a cent, so he begun to whine 
and explain, and said times was hard, and al- 
though he had took a full freight down to Bal- 
sora and got a fat rate for it, he could n't git no 
return freight, and so he war n't making no great 
things out of his trip. So the dervish starts along 
again, and says — 

*' All right, if you w^ant to take the risk, but I 
reckon you 've made a mistake this time, and 
missed a chance." 

Of course the camel driver wanted to know 
what kind of a chance he had missed, because 
maybe there was money in it ; so he run after 
the dervish and begged him so hard and earnest 
to take pity on him and tell him, that at last the 
dervish give in, and says — 

''Do you see that hill yonder? Well, in that 
hill is all the treasures of the earth, and I was 
looking around for a man with a particular good 
kind heart and a noble generous disposition, be- 
cause if I could find just that man, I 've got a 



148  

kind of a salve I could put on his eyes and he 
could see the treasures and get them out." 

So then the camel driver was in a sweat ; and 
he cried, and begged, and took on, and went 
down on his knees, and said he was just that 
kind of a man, and said he could fetch a thou- 
sand people that would say he was n't ever de- 
scribed so exact before. 

'* Well, then," says the dervish, '' all right. If we 
load the hundred camels, can I have half of them ?" 

The driver was so glad he could n't hardly hold 
in, and says — 

" Now you 're shouting." 

So they shook hands on the bargain, and the 
dervish got out his box and rubbed the salve on 
the driver's right eye, and the hill opened and he 
went in, and there, sure enough, was piles and 
piles of gold and jewels sparkling like all the 
stars in heaven had fell down. 

So him and the dervish laid into it and they 
loaded every camel till he could n't carry no 
more, then they said good-by, and each of them 
started off with his fifty. But pretty soon the 
camel driver come a-runninp" and overtook the 
dervish and says — 

" You ain't in society, you know, and you don't 




THE CAMEL-DRIVER IN THE TREASURE-CAVE. 



THE TREASURE-HILL. 151 

really need all you 've got. Won't you be good, 
and let me have ten of your camels ?" 

"Well," the dervish says, ''I don't know but 
what you say is reasonable enough." 

So he done it, and they separated and the der- 
vish started off again with his forty. But pretty 
soon here comes the camel driver bawling after 
him again, and whines and slobbers around and 
begs another ten off of him, saying thirty camel 
loads of treasures was enough to see a dervish 
through, because they live very simple, you know, 
and don't keep house but board around and give 
their note. 

But that war n't the end, yet» That ornery 
hound kept coming and coming till he had 
begged back all the camels and had the whole 
hundred. Then he w^as satisfied, and ever so 
grateful, and said he v^^ould n't ever forgit the 
dervish as long as he lived, and nobody had n't 
ever been so good to him before, and liberal. So 
they shook hands good-by, and separated and 
started off again. 

But do you know, it war n't ten minutes till 
the camel driver was unsatisfied again — he was 
the low-downest reptyle in seven counties — and 
he come a-running again. And this time the 



152  

thing- he wanted was to get the dervish to rub 
some of the salve on his other eye. 

'' Why ? " said the dervish. 

'' Oh, you know," says the driver. 

'* Know what ? " 

" Well, you can't fool me," says the driver. 
" You 're trying to keep back something from 
me, you know it mighty well. You know, 1 
reckon, that if I had the salve on the other eye I 
could see a lot more things that 's valuable. 
Come — please put it on." 

The dervish says — 

" I was n't keeping anything back from you. 
I don't mind telling you what would happen if 
I put it on. You 'd never see again. You 'd be 
stone blind the rest of your days." 

But do you know, that beat would n't believe 
him. No, he begged and begged, and whined 
and cried, till at last the dervish opened his box 
and told him to put it on, if he wanted to. So 
the man done it, and sure enough he was as blind 
as a bat, in a minute. 

Then the dervish laughed at him and mocked 
at him and made fun of him ; and says — 

" Good-by — a man that 's blind hain't got no 
use for jewelry." 



THE TREASURE-HILL. 153 

And he cleared out with the hundred camels, 
and left that man to wander around poor and 
miserable and friendless the rest of his days in 
the desert. 

Jim said he 'd bet it was a lesson to him. 

" Yes," Tom says, '' and like a considerable 
many lessons a body gets. They ain't no ac- 
count, because the thing don't ever happen the 
same way again — and can't. The time Hen 
Scovil fell down the chimbly and crippled his 
back for life, everybody said it would be a les- 
son to him. What kind of a lesson ? How was 
he going to use it ? He could n't climb chim- 
blies no more, and he had n't no more backs to 
break." 

"All de same. Mars Tom, dey is sich a thing 
as learnin' by expe ence. De Good Book say de 
burnt chile shun de fire." 

*' Well, I ain't denying that a thing 's a lesson 
if it 's a thing that can happen twice just the 
same way. There 's lots of such things, and 
^key educate a person, that 's what uncle Abner 
always said ; but there 's forty million lots of the 
other kind — the kind that don't happen the same 
way twice — and they ain't no real use, they ain't 
no more instructive than the small pox. When 



154  

you 've got it, it ain't no good to find out you 
ought to been vaccinated, and it ain't no good 
to get vaccinated afterwards, because the small- 
pox don't come but once. But on the other 
hand uncle Abner said that the person that had 
took a bull by the tail once had learnt sixty or 
seventy times as much as a person that had n't, 
and said a person that started in to carry a cat 
home by the tail was gitting knowledge that was 
always going to be useful to him, and w^ar n't 
ever going to grow dim or doubtful. But I can 
tell you, Jim, uncle Abner was down on them 
people that 's all the time trying to dig a les- 
son out of everything that happens, no matter 
whether — " 

But Jim was asleep. Tom looked kind of 
ashamed, because you know a person always 
feels bad when he is talking uncommon fine and 
thinks the other person is admiring, and that 
other person goes to sleep that way. Of course 
he ought n't to go to sleep, because it 's shabby ; 
but the finer a person talks the certainer it is to 
make you sleep, and so when you come to look 
at it it ain't nobody's fault in particular, both of 
them 's to blame. 

Jim begun to snore — soft and blubbery, at 



THE TREASURE-HILL. 155 

first, then a long rasp, then a stronger one, then 
a half a dozen horrible ones like the last water 
sucking down the plug-hole of a bath-tub, then 
the same with more power to it, and some big 
coughs and snorts flung in, the w^ay a cow does 
that is choking to death ; and when the person 
has got to that point he is at his level best, and 
can wake up a man that is in the next block with 
a dipper full of loddanum in him, but can't wake 
himself up although all that awful noise of his'n 
ain't but three inches from his own ears. And 
that is the curiosest thing in the world, seems to 
me. But you rake a match to light the candle, 
and that little bit of a noise will fetch him. I 
wish I knowed what was the reason of that, but 
there don't seem to be no way to find out. Now 
there was Jim alarming the w^hole Desert, and 
yanking the animals out, for miles and miles 
around, to see what in the nation was going on 
up there ; there w^ar n't nobody nor nothing that 
was as close to the noise as he was, and yet he 
w^as the only cretur that w^as n't disturbed by it. 
We yelled at him and whooped at him, it never 
done no good, but the first time there come a 
little wee noise that was n't of a usual kind it 
woke him up. No, sir, I 've thought it all over. 



156  

and so has Tom, and there ain't no way to find 
out why a snorer can't hear himself snore. 

Jim said he had n't been asleep, he just shut 
his eyes so he could listen better. 

Tom said nobody war n't accusing him. 

That made him look like he wished he had n't 
said anything-. And he wanted to git away 
from the subject, I reckon, because he begun to 
abuse the camel driver, just the way a person 
does when he has got catched in something and 
wants to take it out of somebody else. He let 
into the camel driver the hardest he knowed 
how, and I had to agree with him ; and he 
praised up the dervish the highest he could, and 
I had to agree with him there, too. But Tom 
says — 

" I ain't so sure. You call that dervish so 
dreadful liberal and good and unselfish, but I 
don't quite see it. He did n't hunt up another 
poor dervish, did he ? No, he did n't. If he 
was so unselfish, why did n't he go in there him- 
self and take a pocket full of jewels and go 
along and be satisfied ? No, sir, the person he 
was hunting for was a man with a hundred 
camels. He wanted to get away with all the 
treasure he could." 



THE TREASURE-HILL. 157 

'' Why, Mars Tom, he was wilHii' to divide, 
fair and square ; he only struck for fifty camels." 

" Because he k no wed how he was going to get 
all of them by and by." 

'' Mars Tom, he tole de man de truck would 
make him bline." 

"• Yes, because he knowed the man's character. 
It was just the kind of a man he was hunting for 
— a man that never believes in anybody's word 
or anybody's honorableness, because he ain't got 
none of his own. I reckon there 's lots of peo- 
ple like that dervish. They swindle, right and 
left, but they always make the other person seem 
to swindle himself. They keep inside of the let- 
ter of the law all the time, and there ain't no 
way to git hold of them. They don't put the 
salve on — oh, no, that would be sin ; but they 
know how to fool you into putting it on, then 
it 's you that blinds yourself. I reckon the der- 
vish and the camel driver was just a pair — a fine, 
smart, bramy rascal, and a dull, coarse, ignorant 
one, but both of them rascals, just the same." 

** Mars Tom, does you reckon dey 's any o' dat 
kind o' salve in de worl' now ? " 

** Yes, uncle Abner says there is. He says 
they 've got it in New York, and they put it on 



158  

country people's eyes and show them ail the rail- 
roads in the world, and they go in and git them, 
and then when they rub the salve on the other 
eye the other man bids them good-by and goes 
off with their railroads. Here 's the treasure-hill, 
now. Lower away ! " 

We landed, but it war n't as interesting as I 
thought it was going to be, because we could n't 
find the place where they went in to git the 
treasure. Still, it was plenty interesting enough, 
just to see the mere hill itself where such a won- 
derful thing happened. Jim said he would n't 
'a' missed it for three dollars, and I felt the same 
w^ay. 

And to me and Jim, as wonderful a thing as 
any was the way Tom could come into a strange 
big country like this and go straight and find a 
little hump like that and tell it in a minute from 
a million other humps that was almost just like 
it, and nothing to help him but only his own 
learning and his own natural smartness. We 
talked and talked it over together, but could n't 
make out how he done it. He had the best head 
on him I ever see ; and all he lacked was age, to 
make a name for himself equal to Captain Kidd 
or George Washington. I bet you it would 'a' 



THE TREASURE-HILL. 159 

crowded either of them to find that hill, with all 
their gifts, but it war n't nothing to Tom Saw- 
yer ; he went across Sahara and put his finger on 
it as easy as you could pick a nigger out of a 
bunch of angels. 

We found a pond of salt water close by and 
scraped up a raft of salt around the edges and 
loaded up the lion's skin and the tiger's so as 
they would keep till Jim could tan them. 



CHAPTER XI. 

THE SAND-STORM. 

We went a-fooling along for a day or two, and 
then just as the full moon was touching the 
ground on the other side of the desert, we see a 
string of little black figgers moving across its 
big silver face. You could see them as plain as 
if they was painted on the moon with ink. It 
was another caravan. We cooled down our speed 
and tagged along after it, just to have company, 
though it war n't going our way. It was a rattler, 
that caravan, and a most bully sight to look at, 
next morning when the sun come a-streaming 
across the desert and flung the long shadders of 
the camels on the gold sand like a thousand 
grand-daddy-longlegses marching m procession. 
We never went very near it, because we knowed 
better, now, than to act like that and scare peo- 
ple's camels and break up their caravans. It was 
the gayest outfit you ever see, for rich clothes and 
nobby style. Some of the chiefs rode on drome- 
daries, the first we ever see, and very tall, and 

1 60 



THE SAND-STORM. l6l 

they go plunging along like they was on stilts, 
and they rock the man that is on them pretty 
violent and churn up his dinner considerable, I 
bet you, but they make noble good time and a 
camel ain't novvheres with them for speed. 

The caravan camped, during the middle part 
of the day, and then started again about the mid- 
dle of the afternoon. Before long the sun begun 
to look very curious. First it kind of turned to 
brass, and then to copper, and after that it begun 
to look like a blood-red ball, and the air got hot 
and close, and pretty soon all the sky in the west 
darkened up and looked thick and foggy, but 
fiery and dreadful like it looks through a piece of 
red glass, you know. We looked down and see 
a big confusion going on in the caravan and a 
rushing every which way like they was scared, 
and then they all flopped down flat in the sand 
and laid there perfectly still. 

Pretty soon we see something coming that 
stood up like an amazing wide wall, and reached 
from the desert up into the sky and hid the sun, 
and it was coming like the nation, too. Then a 
little faint breeze struck us, and then it come 
harder, and grains of sand begun to sift against 
our faces and sting like fire, and Tom sung out — 



l62  

" It 's a sand-storm — turn your backs to it !" 

We done it, and in another minute it was blow- 
ing" a gale and the sand beat against us by the 
shovelful! and the air was so thick with it we 
could n't see a thing. In five minutes the boat 
was level full and we was setting on the lockers 
buried up to the chin in sand and only our heads 
out and could hardly breathe. 

Then the storm thinned, and we see that mon- 
strous wall go a-sailing off across the desert, 
awful to look at, I tell you. We dug ourselves 
out and looked down, and where the caravan was 
before, there was n't anything but just the sand 
ocean, now, and all still and quiet. All them 
people and camels was smothered and dead and 
buried — buried under ten foot of sand, we reck- 
oned, and Tom allowed it might be years before 
the wind uncovered them, and all that time their 
friends would n't ever know what become of that 
caravan. Tom said — 

''Now we know what it w^as that happened to 
the people we got the swords and pistols from." 

Yes, sir, that was just it. It was as plain as 
day, now. They got buried in a sand-storm, and 
the wild animals could n't get at them, and the 
wind never uncovered them again till they was 




IN THE SAND-STORM. 



THE SAND-STORM. 165 

dried to leather and war n't fit to eat. It seemed 
to me we had felt as sorry for them poor people 
as a person could for anybody, and as mournful, 
too, but we was mistaken ; this last caravan's 
death went harder with us, a good deal harder. 
You see, the others was total strangers, and we 
never got to feeling acquainted with them at all, 
except, maybe, a little with the man that was 
vv^atching the girl, but it was different with this 
last caravan. We was huvvering around them a 
whole night and 'most a whole day, and had got 
to feeling real friendly with them, and acquainted. 
I have found out that there ain't no surer way to 
find but whether you like people or hate them, than 
to travel with them. Just so with these. We kind 
of liked them from the start, and traveling with 
them put on the finisher. The longer we traveled 
with them, and the more we got used to their ways, 
the better and better we liked them and the glad- 
der and gladder we was that we run across them. 
We had come to know some of them so well that 
we called them by name when we was talking 
about them, and soon got so familiar and socia- 
ble that we even dropped the Miss and the Mister 
and just used their plain names without any han- 
dle, and it did not seem unpolite, but just the 



l66  

right thing. Of course it was n't their own names, 
but names we give them. There was Mr. Elex- 
ander Robinson and Miss AdaUne J\obinson, and 
Col. Jacob McDougal, and Miss Harryet McDou- 
gal, and Judge Jeremiah Butler and young Bush- 
rod Butler, and these was big chiefs, mostly, that 
wore splendid great turbans and simmeters, and 
dressed like the Grand Mogul, and their families. 
But as soon as we come to know them good, and 
like them very much, it war n't Mister, nor Judge, 
nor nothing, any more, but only Elleck, and Ad- 
dy, and Jake, and Hattie, and Jerry and Buck, 
and so on. 

And you know, the more you join in with peo- 
ple in their joys and their sorrows, the more 
nearer and dearer they come to be to you. Now 
we war n't cold and indifferent, the way most trav- 
elers is, we was right down friendly and sociable, 
and took a chance in everything that was going, 
and the caravan could depend on us to be on 
hand every time, it did n't make no difference 
what it w^as. 

When they camped, we camped right over 
them, ten or twelve hundred feet up in the air. 
When they et a meal, we et ourn, and it made it 
ever so much homeliker to have their company. 



THE SAND-STORM. 167 

When they had a wedding, that night, and Buck 
and Addy got married, we got ourselves up in 
the very starchiest of the professor's duds for the 
blow-out, and when they danced we jined in and 
shook a foot up there. 

But it is sorrow and trouble that brings you 
the nearest, and it was a funeral that done it with 
us. It was next morning, just in the still dawn. 
We did n't know the diseased, and he war n't in 
our set, but that never made no difference, he 
belonged to the caravan, and that was enough, 
and there war n't no more sincerer tears shed 
over him than the ones we dripped on him from 
up.there eleven hundred foot on high. 

Yes, parting with this caravan was much more 
bitterer than it was to part with them others, 
which was comparative strangers, and been dead 
so long, anyway. We had knowed these in their 
lives, and was fond of them, too, and now to 
have death snatch them from right before our 
faces whilst we was looking, and leave us so 
lonesome and friendless in the middle of that 
big desert, it did hurt so, and we wished we 
might n't ever make any more friends on that voy- 
age if we was going to lose them again like that. 

We could n't keep from talking about them, 



l68  

and they was all the time coming up in our 
memory, and looking just the way they looked 
when we was all alive and happy together. We 
could see the line marching, and the shiny spear- 
heads a-winking in the sun, we could see the 
dromedaries lumbering along, we could see the 
wedding and the funeral, and more oftener than 
anything else we could see them praying, be- 
cause they don't allow nothing to prevent that ; 
whenever the call come, several times a day, 
they would stop right there, and stand up and 
face to the east, and lift back their heads, and 
spread out their arms and begin, and four or five 
times they would go down on their knees, and 
then fall forwards and touch their forehead to 
the ground. 

Well, it war n't good to go on talking about 
them, lovely as they was in their life, and dear 
to us in their life and death both, because it 
did n't do no good, and made us too down- 
hearted. Jim allowed he was going to live as 
good a life as he could, so he could see them 
again in a better w^orld ; and Tom kept still and 
did n't tell him they was only Mohammedans, it 
war n't no use to disappoint him, he was feeling 
bad enough just as it was. 



THE SAND-STORM. 171 

When we woke up next morning we was feel- 
ing a little cheerfuUer, and had had a most pow- 
erful good sleep, because sand is the comfort- 
ablest bed there is, and I don't see why people 
that can afford it don't have it more. And it 's 
terrible good ballast, too ; ] never see the balloon 
so steady before. 

Tom allowed we had twenty tons of it, and 
wondered what we better do with it ; it was good 
sand, and it did n't seem good sense to throw it 
away. Jim says — 

" Mars Tom, can't we tote it back home en sell 
it? How long '11 it take ? " 

''Depends on the way we go." 

" Well, sah, she 's wuth a quarter of a dollar a 
load, at home, en I reckon we 's got as much as 
twenty loads, hain't we ? How much would dat 
be?" 

'' Five dollars." 

'' By jings. Mars Tom, le's shove for home 
right on de spot! Hit 's more 'n a dollar en a 
half apiece, hain't it ?" 

'' Yes." 

" W^ell, ef dat ain't makin' m.oney de easiest 
ever /struck ! She jes' rained in — never cos' us a 
lick o' work. Le's mosey right along, Mars Tom." 



172  

But Tom was thinking and ciphering" away so 
busy and excited he never heard him. Pretty 
soon he says — 

'' Five dollars — sho ! Look here, this sand 's 
worth — worth — why, it s w orth no end of 
money." 

" How is dat, Mars Tom ? Go on, honey, go 
on!" 

''Well, the minute people knows it s genu- 
wyne sand from the genuwyne Desert of Sahara, 
they '11 just be in a perfect state of mind to git 
hold of some of it to keep on the what-not in a 
vial with a label on it for a curiosity. All we 
got to do, is, to put it up in vials and float around 
all over the United States and peddle them out 
at ten cents apiece. We 've got all of ten thou- 
sand dollars' worth of sand in. this boat." 

Me and Jim went all to pieces with joy, and 
begun to shout whoopjamboreehoo, and Tom 
savs — 

" And we can keep on coming back and fetch- 
ing sand, and coming back and fetching more 
sand, and just keep it a-going till we 've carted 
this whole desert over there and sold it out ; 
and there ain't ever going to be any opposition, 
either, because we '11 take out a patent." 



THE SAND-STORM. 1/3 

"My goodness," I says, "we 'II be as rich as 
Creosote, won't we, Tom ? " 

*' Yes — Creesus, you mean. Why, that der- 
vish was hunting in that Uttle hill for the treas- 
ures of the earth, and did n't know he was walk- 
ing over the real ones for a thousand miles. He 
was blinder than he made the driver." 

** Mars Tom, how much is we gwyne to be 
worth ? " 

"Well, I don't know, yet. It 's got to be 
ciphered, and it ain't the easiest job to do, either, 
because it 's over four million square miles of 
sand at ten cents a vial." 

Jim was awful excited, but this faded it out 
considerable, and he shook his head and says — 

" Mars Tom, we can't 'ford all dem vials — a 
king could n't. We better not try to take de 
w^hole desert. Mars Tom, de vials gwyne to bust 
us, sho'." 

Tom's excitement died out, too, now, and I 
reckoned it was on account of the vials, but it 
was n't. He set there thinking, and got bluer 
and bluer, and at last he says — 

" Boys, it won't work ; we got to give it up." 

"Why, Tom?" 

" On account of the duties." 



1/4  

I could n't make nothing out of that, neither 
could Jim. I says — 

'' What zs our duty, Tom ? Because if we can't 
git around it, why can't we just do it ? People 
often has to." 

But he says — 

" Oh, it ain't that kind of duty. The kind I 
mean is a tax. Whenever you strike a frontier — 
that 's the border of a country, you know — you 
find a custom house there, and the gov'ment of- 
ficers comes and rummages amongst your things 
and charges a big tax, which they call a duty 
because it 's their duty to bust you if they can, 
and if you don't pay the duty they '11 hog your 
sand. They call it confiscating, but that don't 
deceive nobody, it 's just hogging, and that's all 
it is. Now if we try to carry this sand home the 
way we 're pointed now, we got to climb fences 
till we git tired — just frontier after frontier — 
Egypt, Arabia, Hindostan, and so on, and 
they '11 all whack on a duty, and so you see, easy 
enough, we ca7i^ go ^ka^ road." 

*' Why, Tom," I says, '* we can sail right over 
their old frontiers ; how are ^/ley going to stop us ?" 

He looked sorrowful at me, and says, very 
grave — 




WHEN THEY DANCED WE JOINED IN AND SHOOK A FOOT UP THERE. 



THE SAND-STORM. 177 

** Huck Finn, do you thuik that would be 
honest ? " 

I hate them kind of interruptions. I never 
said nothing, and he went on — 

" Well, we 're shut off the other way, too. If 
we go back the w^ay we 've come, there 's the 
New York custom house, and that is worse than 
all of them others put together, on account of 
the kind of cargo we 've got." 

" Why ? " 

" Well, they can't raise Sahara sand in Amer- 
ica, of course, and when they can't raise a thing 
there, the duty is fourteen hundred thousand per 
cent, on it if you try to fetch it in from where 
they do raise it." 

'^ There ain't no sense in that, Tom Sawyer." 

'' Who said there was ? What do you talk to 
me like that, for, Huck Finn ? You wait till I 
say a thing 's got sense in it before you go to ac- 
cusing me of saying it." 

'' All right, consider me crying about it, and 
sorry. Go on." 

Jim says — 

** Mars Tom, do dey jam dat duty onto every- 
thing we can't raise in America, en don't make 
no 'stinction 'twix' anything ? " 



i;8  

'' Yes, that 's what they do." 

*' Mars Tom, ain't de blessin' o' de Lord de 
mos' valuable thing dey is ? " 

''Yes, it is." 

*' Don't de preacher stan' up in de pulpit en 
call it down on de people ? " 

''Yes." 

" Whah do it come from ? " 

" From heaven." 

" Yassir ! you 's jes' right, 'deed you is, honey 
— it come from heaven, en dat 's a foreign coun- 
try. Now den ! de dey put a tax on dat bless- 
in' ? " 

" No, they don't." 

" 'Course dey don't ; en so it stan' to reason 
dat you 's mistaken, Mars Tom. Dey would n't 
put de tax on po' truck like san', dat everybody 
ain't 'bleeged to have, en leave it off'n de bes' 
thing dey is, which nobody can't git along wid- 
out." 

Tom Sawyer was stumped ; he see Jim had 
got him w^here he could n't budge. He tried to 
wiggle out by saying they had forgot to put on 
that tax, but they 'd be sure to remember about 
it, next session of Congress, and then they 'd put 
it on, but that was a poor lame come-off, and he 



THE SAND-STORM. 179 

knowed it. He said there war n't nothing for- 
eign that war n't taxed but just that one, ai d so 
they could n't be consistent without taxing it, 
and to be consistent was the first law of politics. 
So he stuck to it that they 'd left it out unin- 
tentional and would be certain to do their best to 
fix it before they got caught and laughed at. 

But I did n't feel no more interest in such 
things, as long as we could n't git our sand 
through, and it made me low-spirited, and Jim 
the same. Tom he tried to cheer us up by say- 
ing he would think up another speculation for us 
that would be just as good as this one and bet- 
ter, but it did n't do no good, we did n't believe 
there was any as big as this. It was mighty 
hard ; such a little while ago we was so rich, and 
could 'a' bought a country and started a kingdom 
and been celebrated and happy, and now we 
was so poor and ornery again, and had our sand 
left on our hands. The sand was looking so 
lovely, before, just like gold and dimonds, and 
the feel of it w^as so soft and so silky and nice, 
but now I could n't bear the sight of it, it made 
me sick to look at it, and I knowed I would n't 
ever feel comfortable again till we got shut of it, 
and I did n't have it there no more to remind us 



l80  

of what we had been and what we had got de- 
graded down to. The others was feehng the 
same way about it that I was. I knowed it, be- 
cause they cheered up so, the minute I says le' 's 
throw this truck overboard. 

Well, it was going to be work, you know, and 
pretty solid work, too ; so Tom he divided it up 
according to fairness and strength. He said me 
and him would clear out a fifth apiece, of the 
sand, and Jim three fifths. Jim he did n't quite 
like that arrangement. He says — 

'' 'Course I ^s de stronges', en I 's willin' to do 
a share accordin', but by jings you 's kinder 
pilin' it onto ole Jim, Mars Tom, hain't you ? " 

'* Well, I did n't think so, Jim, but you try 
your hand at fixing it, and let 's see." 

So Jim he reckoned it would n't be no more 
than fair if me and Tom done a tenth apiece. 
Tom he turned his back to git room and be pri- 
vate, and then he smole a smile that spread 
around and covered the whole Sahara to the 
westward, back to the Atlantic edge of it where 
we come from. Then he turned around again 
and said it was a good enough arrangement, and 
we was satisfied if Jim was. Jim said he was. 

So then Tom measured off our two tenths in 



THE SAND-STORM. l8l 

the bow and left the rest for Jim, and it sur- 
prised Jim a good deal to see how much differ- 
ence there was and what a raging lot of sand his 
share come to, and said he was powerful glad, 
now, that he had spoke up in time and got the 
first arrangement altered, for he said that even 
the way it was now % there was more sand than 
enjoyment in his end of the contract, he believed. 
Then we laid into it. It was mighty hot 
work, and tough ; so hot we had to move up 
into cooler weather or we could n't 'a' stood it. 
Me and Tom took turn about, and one worked 
while t' other rested, but there w^ar n't nobody to 
spell poor old Jim, and he made all that part of 
Africa damp, he sweated so. We could n't work 
good, we was so full of laugh, and Jim he kept 
fretting and wanting to know w^hat tickled us 
so, and we had to keep making up things to ac- 
count for it, and they was pretty poor inven- 
tions, but they done well enough, Jim did n't see 
through them. At last when we got done we 
was 'most dead, but not with work but with 
laughing. By and by Jim was 'most dead too, 
but it was with work ; then we took turns and 
spelled him, and he was as thankful as he could 
be, and w^ould set on the sfunnel and swab the 



I82  

sweat, and heave and pant, and say how good 
we was to a poor old nigger, and he would n't 
ever forgit us. He was always the gratefulest 
nigger I ever see, for any little thing you done 
for him. He was only nigger outside ; inside he 
was as white as you be. 



CHAPTER XII. 

JIM STANDING SIEGE, 

The next few meals was pretty sandy, but that 
don't make no difference when you are hungry ; 
and when you ain't it ain't no satisfaction to eat, 
anyway, and so a Httle grit in the meat ain't no 
particular drawback, as far as I can see. 

Then we struck the east end of the desert at 
last, sailing on a north-east course. Away off on 
the edge of the sand, in a soft pinky light, we 
see three little sharp roofs like tents, and Tom 
says — 

'' It 's the pyramids of Egypt." 

It made my heart fairly jump. You see, I had 
seen a many and a many a picture of them, and 
heard tell about them a hundred times, and yet 
to come on them all of a sudden, that way, and 
find they was rea/, 'stead of imaginations 'most 
knocked the breath out of me with surprise. 
It 's a curious thing, that the more you hear 
about a grand and big and bully thing or per- 
son, the more it kind of dreamies out, as you 

183 



l84  

may say, and gets to be a big dim wavery figger 
made out of moonshine and nothing soUd to it. 
It 's just so with George Washington, and the 
same with them pyramids. 

And moreover besides, the thing they always 
said about them seemed to me to be stretchers. 
There was a feller come to the Sunday-school, 
once, and had a picture of them, and made a 
speech, and said the biggest pyramid covered 
thirteen acres, and was most five hundred foot 
high, just a steep mountain, all built out of 
hunks of stone as big as a bureau, and laid up 
in perfectly regular layers, like stair-steps. 
Thirteen acres, you see, for just one building ; 
it 'sa farm. If it had n't been in Sunday-school, 
I would 'a' judged it was a lie ; and outside I was 
certain of it. And he said there was a hole in 
the pyramid, and you could go in there with 
candles, and go ever so far up a long slanting 
tunnel, and come to a larg^e room in the stomach 
of that stone mountain, and there you would 
find a big stone chest with a king in it, four 
thousand years old. I said to myself, then, if 
that ain't a lie I will eat that king if they will 
fetch him, for even Methusalem war n't that old, 
and nobody claims it. 



JIM STANDING SIEGE. 185 

As we come a little nearer we see the yaller 
sand come to an end in a long straight edge like 
a blanket, and onto it was joined, edge to edge, 
a wide country of bright green, with a snaky 
stripe crooking through it, and Tom said it was 
the Nile. It made my heart jump again, for the 
Nile was another thing that was n't real to me. 
Now I can tell you one thing which is dead cer- 
tain : if you will fool along over three thousand 
miles of yaller sand, all glimmering with heat so 
that it makes your eyes water to look at it, and 
you 've been a considerable part of a week doing 
it, the green country will look so like home and 
heaven to you that it will make your eyes water 
amin. 

It was just so with me, and the same with 
Jim. 

And when Jim got so he could believe it was 
the land of Egypt he was looking at, he would 
n't enter it standing up, but got down on his 
knees and took off his hat, because he said it 
was n't fitten' for a humble poor nigger to come 
any other way where such men had been as 
Moses and Joseph and Pharaoh and the other 
prophets. He was a Presbyterian, and had a 
most deep respect for Moses which was a Pres- 



l86  

byterian too, he said. He was all stirred up, 
and says — 

'' Hit 's de Ian' of Egypt, de Ian' of Egypt, en 
I 's 'lowed to look at it wid my own eyes ! En 
dah 's de river dat was turn' to blood, en I 's 
looking at de very same groun' whah de plagues 
was, en de lice, en de frogs, en de locus', en de 
hail, en whah dey marked de door-pos', en de 
angel o' de Lord come by in de darkness o' de 
night en slew de fust-born in all de Ian' o' Egypt. 
Ole Jim ain't worthy to see dis day ! " 

And then he just broke down and cried, he 
was so thankful. So between him and Tom 
there was talk enough, Jim being excited be- 
cause the land w^as so full of history — Joseph 
and his brethren, Moses in the bulrushers, Jacob 
coming down into Egypt to buy corn, the silver 
cup in the sack, and all them interesting things, 
and Tom just as excited too, because the land 
was so full of history that w^as in his line, about 
Noureddin, and Bedreddin, and such like mon- 
strous giants, that made Jim's wool rise, and a 
raft of other Arabian Nights folks, which the 
half of them never done the things they let on 
they done, I don't believe. 

Then we struck a disappointment, for one of 



JIM STANDING SIEGE. 187 

them early -morning" fogs started up, and it 
war n't no use to sail over the top of it, because 
we would go by Egypt, sure, so we judged it 
was best to set her by compass straight for the 
place where the pyramids was gitting blurred 
and blotted out, and then drop low and skin 
along pretty close to the ground and keep a 
sharp lookout. Tom took the helium, I stood 
by to let go the anchor, and Jim he straddled 
the bow to dig through the fog with his eyes 
and w^atch out for danger ahead. We wxnt 
along a steady gait, but not very fast, and the 
fog got solider and solider, so solid that Jim 
looked dim and ragged and smoky through it. 
It was awful still, and we talked low and was 
anxious. Now and then Jim would say — 

'' Highst her a p'int, Mars Tom, highst her ! " 
and up she w^ould skip, a foot or two, and we 
would slide right over a flat-roofed mud cabin, 
with people that had been asleep on it just be- 
ginning to turn out and gap and stretch ; and 
once when a feller was clear up on his hind legs 
so he could gap and stretch better, we took him 
a blip in the back and knocked him off. By and 
by, after about an hour, and everything dead 
still and we a-strainino- our ears for sounds and 



l88  

holding our breath, the fog thinned a httle, very 
sudden, and Jmi sung out in an awful scare — 

*• Oh, for de lan's sake, set her back, Mars 
Tom, here 's de biggest giant outen de 'Rabian 
Nights a-comin' for us ! " and he went over back- 
wards in the boat. 

Tom slammed on the back-action, and as we 
slowed to a standstill, a man's face as big as our 
house at home looked in over the gunnel, same 
as a house looks out of its windows, and I laid 
down and died. I must 'a' been clear dead and 
gone for as much as a minute or more ; then I 
come to, and Tom had hitched a boat-hook onto 
the low^er lip of the giant and was holding the 
balloon steady with it whilst he canted his head 
back and got a good long look up at that awful 
face. 

Jim was on his knees with his hands clasped, 
gazing up at the thing in a begging way, and 
working his lips but not getting anything out. 
I took only just a glimpse, and was fading out 
again, but Tom says — 

*' He ain't alive, you fools, it' s the Sphinx ! " 

I never see Tom look so little and like a fly ; 
but that was because the giant's head was so big 
and awful. Awful, yes, so it was, but not dread- 



JIM STANDING SIEGE. 189 

ful, any more, because you could see it was a 
noble face, and kind of sad, and not thinking 
about you, but about other things and larger. 
It was stone, reddish stone, and its nose and 
ears battered, and that give it an abused look, 
and you felt sorrier for it, for that. 

We stood off a piece, and sailed around it and 
over it, and it was just grand. It was a man's 
head, or maybe a woman's, on a tiger's body a 
hundred and twenty-five foot long, and there 
was a dear little temple between its front paws. 
All but the head used to be under the sand, for 
hundreds of years, maybe thousands, but they 
had just lately dug the sand away and found 
that little temple. It took a power of sand to 
bury that cretur ; most as much as it would to 
bury a steamboat, I reckon. 

We landed Jim on top of the head, with an 
American flag to protect him, it being a foreign 
land, then we sailed off to this and that and 
t' other distance, to git what Tom called effects 
and perspectives and proportions, and Jim he 
done the best he could, striking all the different 
kinds of attitudes and positions he could study 
up, but standing on his head and working his 
legs the way a frog does was the best. The 



I90  

further we got away, the httler Jim got, and the 
grander the Sphinx got, till at last it was only a 
clothes-pin on a dome, as you might say. 
That 's the way perspective brings out the cor- 
rect proportions, Tom said ; he said Julus Cesar's 
niggers did n't know how big he was, they was 
too close to him. 

Then we sailed off further and further, till we 
could n't see Jim at all, any more, and then that 
great figger was at its noblest, a-gazing out over 
the Nile valley so still and solemn and lonesome, 
and all the little shabby huts and things that 
was scattered about it clean disappeared and 
gone, and nothing around it now but a soft wide 
spread of yaller velvet, which was the sand. 

That was the right place to stop, and we done 
it. We set there a-looking and a-thinking for a 
half an hour, nobody a-saying anything, for it 
made us feel quiet and kind of solemn to remem- 
ber it had been looking over that valley just that 
same way, and thinking its awful thoughts all 
to itself for thousands of years, and nobody 
can't find out what they are to this day. 

At last I took up the glass and see some little 
black things a-capering around on that velvet 
carpet, and some more a-climbing up the cretur's 



1 s 

'^ 






HV-S' -"V 



mk^''^^'^^~ 




■:^'<^ 



r4 ?3';/e^.a- 




l4^'J 



■>.-*•. ^ 



JIM STANDING A SIEGE. 



JIM STANDING SIEGE. 193 

back, and then I see two or three wee puffs of 
white smoke, and told Tom to look. He done 
it, and says — 

** They 're bugs. No — hold on ; they — why, I 
believe they 're men. Yes, it 's men — men and 
horses, both. They 're hauling a long ladder up 
onto the Sphinx's back — now ain't that odd? 
And now they 're trying to lean it up a — there 's 
some more puffs of smoke — it 's guns ! Huck, 
they 're after Jim ! " 

We clapped on the power, and w^ent for them 
a-biling. We w^as there in no time, and come 
a-whizzing down amongst them, and they broke 
and scattered every which way, and some that 
was climbing the ladder after Jim let go all holts 
and fell. We soared up and found him laying 
on top of the head panting and most tuckered 
out, partly from howling for help and partly 
from scare. He had been standing a siege a 
long time — a week, he said, but it war n't so, it 
only just seemed so to him because they was 
crowding him so. They had shot at him, and 
rained the bullets all around him, but he war n't 
hit, and w^hen they found he would n't stand up 
and the bullets could n't git at him when he was 
laying down, they went for the ladder, and then 



194  

he knowed it was all up with him if we did n't 
come pretty quick. Tom was very indignant, 
and asked him why he did n't show the flag and 
command them io git, in the name of the United 
States. Jim said he done it, but they never paid 
no attention. Tom said he would have this 
thing looked into at Washington, and sa)s — 

" You '11 see that they '11 have to apologize for 
insulting the flag, and pay an indemnity, too, on 
top of it, even if they git off that easy." 

Jim says — 

"What 's an indemnity, Mars Tom?" 

** It 's cash, that 's what it is." 

" Who gits it, Mars Tom ? " 

** Why, we do." 

'' En who gits de apology ?" 

''The United States. Or, we can take which- 
ever we please. W^e can take the apology, if we 
want to, and let the gov'ment take the money." 

" How much money will it be, Mars Tom ?" 

"Well, in an aggravated case like this one, it 
will be at least three dollars apiece, and I don't 
know but more." 

" Well, den, we '11 take de money, Mars Tom, 
blame de 'pology. Hain't dat yo' notion, too ? 
En hain't it vourn, Huck?" 



JIM STANDING SIEGE. 195 

We talked it over a little and allowed that that 
was as good a way as any, so we agreed to take 
the money. It was a new business to me, and I 
asked Tom if countries always apologized w hen 
they had done wrong, and he says — 

" Yes ; the little ones does." 

We was sailing around examining the pyra- 
mids, you know ,. and now we soared up and 
roosted on the flat top of the biggest one, and 
found it was just like what the man said in the 
Sunday-school. It was like four pairs of stairs 
that starts broad at the bottom and slants up 
and comes together in a point at the top, only 
these stair-steps could n't be dumb the w^ay you 
climb other stairs ; no, for each step was as high 
as your chin, and you have to be boosted up from 
behind. The two other pyramids war n't far 
away, and the people moving about on the sand 
between looked like bugs crawling, we was so 
high above them. 

Tom he could n't hold himself he was so 
worked up with gladness and astonishment to 
be in such a celebrated place, and he just dripped 
history from every pore, seemed to me. He said 
he could n't scarcely believe he was standing on 
the very identical spot the prince flew from on 



196  

the Bronze Horse. It was in the Arabian Night 
times, he said. Somebody give the prince a 
bronze horse with a peg in its shoulder, and he 
could git on him and fly through the air like a 
bird, and go all over the world, and steer it by 
turning the peg, and fly high or low and land 
wherever he wanted to. 

When he got done telling it there was one of 
them uncomfortable silences that comes, you 
know, when a person has been telling a whopper 
and you feel sorry for him and wish you could 
think of some way to change the subject and let 
him down easy, but git stuck and don't see no 
way, and before you can pull your mind together 
and do something, that silence has got in and 
spread itself and done the business. I was em- 
barrassed, Jim he was embarrassed, and neither 
of us could n't say a word. Well, Tom he glow- 
ered at me a minute, and says — 

'' Come, out with it. What do you think?" 

I says — 

" Tom Sawyer, you don't believe that, yourself." 

** What 's the reason I don't ? What 's to bender 
me?" 

** There 's one thing to hender you : it could n't 
happen, that 's all." 



JIM STANDING SIEGE. 197 

*' What 's the reason it could n't happen ?" 

" You tell me the reason it could happen." 

"■ This balloon is a good enough reason it could 
happen, I should reckon." 

•' Why is it?" 

*' Why Is it '^ I never saw such an idiot. Ain't 
this balloon and the bronze horse the same thing 
under different names ?" 

"No, they 're not. One is a balloon and the 
other 's a horse. It 's very different. Next you '11 
be saying a house and a cow is the same thing." 

" By Jackson, Huck 's got him ag'in ! Dey ain't 
no wigglin' outer dat ! " 

''Shut your head, Jim; you don't know what 
you 're talking about. And Huck don't. Look 
here, Huck, I '11 make it plain to you, so you can 
understand. You see, it ain't the mere fomn 
that's got anything to do with their being similar 
or unsimilar, it 's \\\^ principle involved ; and the 
principle is the same in both. Don't you see, 
now ? " 

I turned it over in my mind, and says — 

'' Tom, it ain't no use. Principles is all very 
well, but they don't git around that one big fact, 
that the thing that a balloon can do ain't no sort 
of proof of what a horse can do." . 



198 TOM SAWVLK ABROAD. 

"Shucks, Huck, you don't get the idea at all. 
Now look here a minute — it 's perfectly plain. 
Don't we fly through the air ?" 

- Yes." 

'* Very well. Don't we fly high or fly low, just 
as we please ?" 
''Yes." 
*' Don't we steer whichever way we want to ?" 

- Yes." 

'* And don't we land when and where we 
please?" 

'' Yes." 

" How do we move the balloon and steer 
it?" 

'' By touching the buttons." 

" Now I reckon the thing is clear to you at last. 
In the other case the moving and steering was 
done by turning a peg. We touch a button, the 
prince turned a peg. There ain't an atom of dif- 
ference, you see. I knowed I could git it through 
your head if I stuck to it long enough." 

He felt so happy he begun to whistle. But me 
and Jim was silent, so he broke off surprised, and 
says — 

*' Looky here, Huck Fhin, don't you see \\, yet f' 

I says — 



JIM STANDING SIEGE. 20I 

''Torn Sawyer, I want to ask you some ques- 
tions." 

** Go ahead," he says, and I see Jim chirk up to 
listen. 

** As I understand it, the whole thing is in the 
buttons and the peg — the rest ain't of no conse- 
quence. A button is one shape, a peg is another 
shape, but that ain't any matter?" 

''No, that ain't any matter, as long as they 've 
both got the same power." 

*' All right, then. What is the power that 's in 
a candle and in a match ? " 

'' It 's the fire." 

''It 's the same in both, then?" 

" Yes, just the same in both." 

" All right. Suppose I set fire to a carpenter 
shop with a match, what will happen to that car- 
penter shop ?" 

" She '11 burn up." 

" And suppose I set fire to this pyramid with a 
candle — will she burn up?" 

" Of course she won't." 

" All right. Now the fire 's the same, both 
times. Why does the shop burn, and the pyramid 
don't?" 

" Because the pyramid ca^it burn." 



202  

'' Aha ! and a horse canU fly I " 

'' My Ian', ef Huck ain't got him ag'in ! Huck 's 
landed him high en dry dis time, /tell you ! Hit 's 
de smartes' trap I ever see a body walk inter — en 
ef I— " 

But Jim w^as so full of laugh he got to stran- 
gling and could n't go on, and Tom was that mad 
to see how neat I had floored him, and turned 
his own argument ag'in him and knocked him all 
to rags and flinders with it that all he could man- 
age to say was that whenever he heard me and 
Jim try to argue it made him ashamed of the hu- 
man race. I never said nothing, I was feeling 
pretty well satisfied. ^ When I have got the best 
of a person that way, it ain't my way to go around 
crowing about it the way some people does, for I 
consider that if I was in his place I would n't 
wish him to crow over me. It 's better to be gen- 
erous, that 's what I think. 



CHAPTER XIII. 

GOING FOR TOM'S PIPE. 

By and by we left Jim to float around up there 
in the neighborhood of the pyramids, and we 
clumb down to the hole where you go into the 
tunnel, and went in with some Arabs and can- 
dles, and away in there in the middle of the pyr- 
amid we found a room and a big stone box in it 
where they used to keep that king, just as the 
man in the Sunday-school said, but he w^as gone, 
now, somebody had got him. But I did n't take 
no interest in the place, because there could be 
ghosts there, of course ; not fresh ones, but I 
don't like no kind. 

So then we come out and got some little don- 
keys and rode a piece, and then went in a boat 
another piece, and then more donkeys, and 
got to Cairo ; and all the way the road was 
as smooth and beautiful a road as ever I see, and 
had tall date pams on both sides, and naked chil- 
dren everywhere, and the men was as red as cop- 
per, and fine and strong and handsome. And 

203 



204  

the city was a curiosity. Such narrow streets — 
why, they were just lanes, and crowded with peo- 
ple with turbans, and women with veils, and 
everybody rigged out in blazing bright clothes and 
all sorts of colors, and you wondered how the cam- 
els and the people got by each other in such nar- 
row little cracks, but they done it — a perfect jam, 
you see, and everybody noisy. The stores war n't 
big enough to turn around in, but you did n't 
have to go in ; the storekeeper sat tailor fashion 
on his counter, smoking his snaky long pipe, and 
had his things where he could reach them to sell, 
and he was just as good as in the street, for the 
camel-loads brushed him as they went by. 

Now and then a grand person flew by in a car- 
riage with fancy dressed men running and yell- 
ing in front of it and whacking anybody with a 
long rod that did n't get out of the way. And 
by and by along comes the Sultan riding horse- 
back at the head of a procession, and fairly took 
your breath away his clothes was so splendid ; 
and everybody fell flat and laid on his stomach 
while he went by. I forgot, but a feller helped 
me remember. He was one that had a rod and 
run in front. 

There was churches, but they don't know 



GOING FOR TOM'S PIPE. 205 

enough to keep Sunday, they keep Friday and 
break the Sabbath. You have to take off your 
shoes when you go in. There was crowds of men 
and boys in the church, setting in groups on the 
stone floor and making no end of noise — getting 
their lessons by heart, Tom said, out of the Ko- 
ran, which they think is a Bible, and people that 
knows better knows enough to not let on. I 
never see such a big church in my life before, and 
most awful high, it was ; it made you dizzy to 
look up; our village church at home ain't a cir- 
cumstance to it ; if you was to put it in there, 
people would think it was a dry-goods box. 

What I wanted to see was a dervish, because I 
was interested in dervishes on accounts of the one 
that played the trick on the camel driver. So we 
found a lot in a kind of a church, and they called 
themselves Whirling Dervishes ; and they did 
whirl, too, I never see anything like it. They 
had tall sugar-loaf hats on, and linen petticoats ; 
and they spun and spun and spun, round and 
round like tops, and the petticoats stood out on 
a slant, and it was the prettiest thing I ever see, 
and made me drunk to look at it. They was all 
Moslems, Tom said, and when I asked him what 
a Moslem was, he said it w^as a person that was n't 



206  

a Presbyterian. So there is plenty of them in 
Missouri, though I did n't know it before. 

We did n't see half there was to see in Cairo, 
because Tom was in such a sweat to hunt out 
places that was celebrated in history. We had a 
most tiresome time to find the granary where 
Joseph stored up the grain before the famine, 
and when we found it it war n't worth much to 
look at, being such an old tumble-down wreck, 
but Tom was satisfied, and made more fuss over 
it than I would make if I stuck a nail in my foot. 
How he ever found that place was too many for 
me. We passed as much as forty just like it be- 
fore we came to it, and any of them would 'a' done 
for me, but none but just the right one would 
suit him ; I never see anybody so particular as 
Tom Sawyer. The minute he struck the right 
one he reconnized it as easy as I would reconnize 
my other shirt if I had one, but how he done it 
he could n't any more tell than he could fly ; he 
said so himself. 

Then we hunted a long time for the house 
where the boy lived that learned the cadi how to 
try the case of the old olives and the new ones, 
and said it was out of the Arabian Nights and 
he would tell me and Jim about it when he got 



GOING FOR TOM'S PIPE. 207 

time. Well, we hunted and hunted till I was 
ready to drop, and 1 wanted Tom to give it up 
and come next day and git somebody that knowed 
the town and could talk Missourian and could 
go straight to the place ; but no, he wanted to 
find it himself, and nothing else would answer. 
So on we went. Then at last the remarkablest 
thing happened I ever see. The house was gone 
— gone hundreds of years ago — every last rag of 
it gone but just one mud brick. Now a person 
would n't ever believe that a backwoods Mis- 
souri boy that had n't ever been in that town be- 
fore could go and hunt that place over and find 
that brick, but Tom Sawyer done it. I know he 
done it, because I see him do it. I was right by 
his very side at the time, and see him see the 
brick and see him reconnize it. Well, I says to 
myself, how does he do it ? is it know^ledge, or 
is it instink ? 

Now there 's the facts, just as they happened : 
let everybody explain it their own way. I 've 
ciphered over it a good deal, and it 's my opin- 
ion that some of it is knowledge but the main 
bulk of it is instink. The reason is this. Tom 
put the brick in his pocket to give to a museum 
with his name on it and the facts when he went 



208  

home, and 1 slipped it out and put another brick 
considerable like it in its place, and he did n't 
know the difference — but there was a difference, 
you see. I think that settles it — it 's mostly m- 
stink, not knowledge. Instink tells him where 
the exact //^r^ is for the brick to be in, and so he 
reconnizes it by the place it 's in, not by the look 
of the brick. If it was knowledge, not instink, he 
would know the brick again by the look of it the 
next time he seen it — which he did n't. So it 
shows that for all the brag you hear about knowl- 
edge being such a wonderful thing, instink is 
worth forty of it for real unerringness. Jim says 
the same. 

When we got back Jim dropped down and 
took us in, and there was a young man there 
with a red skull cap and tassel on and a beauti- 
ful blue silk jacket and baggy trousers with a 
shawl around his waist and pistols in it that could 
talk English and wanted to hire to us as guide 
and take us to Mecca and Medina and Central 
Africa and everywheres for a half a dollar a day 
and his keep, and we hired him and left, and piled 
on the power, and by the time we was through 
dinner we was over the place where the Israelites 
crossed the Red Sea when Pharaoh tried to over- 



GOING FOR TOM'S PIPE. 211 

taKC them and was caught by the waters. We 
stopped, then, and had a good look at the place, 
and it done Jim good to see it. He said he could 
see it all, now, just the way it happened ; he 
could see the Israelites walking along between 
the walls of water, and the Egyptians coming, 
from aw^ay off yonder, hurrying all they could, 
and see them start in as the Israelites went out, 
and then, w^hen they was all in, see the walls 
tumble together and drown the last man of them. 
Then w^e piled on the power again and rushed 
away and huvvered over Mount Sinai, and saw 
the place where Moses broke the tables of stone, 
and w^here the children of Israel camped in the 
plain and worshipped the golden calf, and it was 
all just as interesting as could be, and the guide 
knowed every place as w^ell as I know the village 
at home. 

But we had an accident, now, and it fetched 
all the plans to a standstill. Tom's old ornery 
corn-cob pipe had got so old and swelled and 
warped that she could n't hold together any 
longer, notw^ithstanding the strings and band- 
ages, but caved in and went to pieces. Tom he 
did n't know what to do. The professor's pipe 
would n't answer, it wMr n't anything but a mer- 



212  

shum, and a person that 's g-ot used to a cob pipe 
knows it lays a long ways over all the olhc r j)ipes 
in this world, and you can't git him to smoke any 
other. He would n't take mine, I could n't per- 
suade him. So there he was. 

He thought it over, and said we must scour 
around and see if we could roust out one in 
Eg-ypt or Arabia or around in some of these 
countries, but the guide said no, it war n't no 
use, they did n't have them. So Tom was pretty 
glum for a little vs^hile, then he chirked up and 
said he 'd got the idea and knowed what to do. 
He says — 

" I 've got another corn-cob pipe, and it 's a 
prime one, too, and nearly new^ It 's laying on 
the rafter that 's right over the kitchen stove at 
home in the village. Jim, you and the guide will 
go and get it, and me and Huck will camp here 
on Mount Sinai till you come back." 

'* But Mars Tom, we could n't ever find de vil- 
lage. I could find de pipe, 'caze I knows de 
kitchen, but my Ian', lue can't ever find de vil- 
lage, nur Sent Louis, nur none o' dem places. 
We don't know de way. Mars Tom." 

That was a fact, and it stumped Tom for a 
minute. Then he said — 



GOING FOR TOM'S PIPE. 213 

'* Looky here, it can be done, sure ; and 1 '11 
tell you how. You set your compass and sail 
west as straight as a dart, till you find the United 
States. It ain't any trouble, because it 's the first 
land you '11 strike the other side of the Atlan- 
tic. If it 's daytime when you strike it, bulge 
right on. straight west from the upper part of 
the Florida coast, and in an hour and three quar- 
ters you '11 hit the mouth of the Mississippi — at 
the speed that I 'm going to send you. You '11 
be so high up in the air that the earth will be 
curved considerable — sorter like a washbowl 
turned upside down — and you '11 see a raft of 
rivers crawling around every which way, long 
before you get there, and you can pick out the 
Mississippi without any trouble. Then you can 
follow the river north nearly, an hour and three 
quarters, till you see the Ohio come in; then you 
want to look sharp, because you 're getting near. 
Away up to your left you '11 see another thread 
coming in — that 's the Missouri and is a little 
above St. Louis. You '11 come down low, then, so 
as you can examine the villages as you spin along. 
You '11 pass about twenty-five in the next fifteen 
minutes, and you '11 recognize ours when you see 
it — and if you don't, you can yell down and ask." 



214  

•* Ef it 's dat easy, Mars Tom, 1 reckon we kin 
do it — yassir, I knows we kin." 

The guide was sure of it, too, and thought 
that he could learn to stand his watch in a little 
while. 

** Jim can learn you the whole thing in a half 
an hour," Tom said. '* This balloon 's as easy to 
manage as a canoe." 

Tom got out the chart and marked out the 
course and measured it, and says — 

" To go back west is the shortest way, you 
see. It 's only about seven thousand miles. If 
you went east, and so on around, it 's over twice 
as far." Then he says to the guide, *'I want 
you both to watch the tell-tale all through the 
watches, and w^henever it don't mark three hun- 
dred miles an hour, you go higher or drop lower 
till you find a storm-current that 's going your 
way. There 's a hundred miles an hour in this 
old thing without any wind to help. There 's 
two hundred-mile gales to be found, any time 
you want to hunt for them." 

" We '11 hunt for them, sir." 

"See that you do. Sometimes you may have 
to go up a couple of miles, and it '11 be p'ison 
cold, but most of the time you '11 find your storm 




,f 



V 






GOING FOR TOiM'S PIPE. 217 

a good deal lower. If you can only strike a 
cyclone — that 's the ticket for you ! You '11 see 
by the professor's books that they travel west in 
these latitudes ; and they travel low, too." 

Then he ciphered on the time, and says — 

'' Seven thousand miles, three hundred miles 
an hour — you can make the trip in a day — 
twenty-four hours. This is Thursday ; you '11 be 
back here Saturday afternoon. Come, now% hus- 
tle out some blankets and food and books and 
things for me and Huck, and you can start right 
alonof. There ain't no occasion to fool around — 
I want a smoke, and the quicker you fetch that 
pipe^ the better." 

All hands jumped for the things, and in eight 
minutes our things was out and the balloon was 
ready for America. So w^e shook hands good- 
bye, and Tom give his last orders : 

*' It 's 10 minutes to 2 p. m., now% Mount Sinai 
time. In 24 hours you '11 be home, and it '11 be 
6 to-morrow morning, village time. When you 
strike the village, land a little back of the top of 
the hill, in the woods, out of sight ; then you rush 
down, Jim, and shove these letters in the post- 
office, and if you see anybody stirring, pull your 
slouch down over your face so they won't know 



2l8  

you. Then you go and slip in the back way, to 
the kitchen and git the pipe, and lay this piece 
of paper on the kitchen table and put something 
on it to hold it, and then slide out and git away 
and don't let Aunt Polly catch a sight of you, 
nor nobody else. Then you jump for the bal- 
loon and shove for Mount Sinai three hundred 
miles an hour. You won't have lost more than 
an hour. You '11 start back at 7 or 8 a. m., village 
time, and be here in 24 hours, arriving at 2 or 3 
p. m.. Mount Sinai time." 

Tom he read the piece of paper to us. He 
had wrote on it — 

'' Thursday Afternoon. Tom Sazvyer the Er. 
7^onort sends his love to Aiuit Polly from Mount 
Sinai where the Aj^k was, and so does Huck Finn, 
and she will get it to-moi^row morning half past 






Tom Sawyer the Erronort." 



"That '11 make her eyes bulge out and the 
tears come," he says. Then he says — 

"Stand by! One — two — three — away you 



go! 



* This misplacing of the Ark is probably Huck's error, not Tom's. 

— M. T. 



GOING FOR TOM'S PIPE. 219 

And away she did go ! Why, she seemed to 
whiz out of sight in a second. 

Then we found a most comfortable cave that 
looked out over that whole big plain, and there 
we camped to wait for the pipe. 



The balloon come back all right, and brung 
the pipe ; but Aunt Polly had catched Jim when 
he was getting it, and anybody can guess what 
happened : she sent for Tom. So Jim he says — 

*' Mars Tom, she 's out on de porch wid her 
eye sot on de sky a-layin' for you, en she say 
she ain 't gw^yne to budge from dah tell she gits 
hold of you. Dey 's gwyne to be trouble. Mars 
Tom, 'deed dey is." 

So then we shoved for home, and not feeling 
very gay, neither. 




